   ChipDoc v3 on JCOP 4 P71 in
   ICAO EAC with PACE
   configuration
   Security Target Lite
   Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                             Evaluation documentation
   Final                                                                   PUBLIC




Document information
Info                 Content
Keywords            Common Criteria, Security Target Lite, ChipDoc v3, JCOP 4 P71, ICAO
                    EAC, PACE
Abstract            Security Target Lite of ChipDoc v3 application on JCOP 4 P71 in ICAO
                    EAC with PACE configuration, which is developed and provided by NXP
                    Semiconductors, Business Unit Identification according to the Common
                    Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation Version 3.1 at
                    Evaluation Assurance Level 5 augmented.
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



Revision history
Rev         Date            Description
1.0         2020-02-12      Initial Version of this Security Target Lite




Contact information
For more information, please visit: http://www.nxp.com
For sales office addresses, please send an email to: salesaddresses@nxp.com
                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  2 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                             ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                       Security Target Lite




1. ST Introduction (ASE_INT)
                 1.1 ST Reference and TOE Reference
                       Table 1.       ST Reference and TOE Reference
                       Title                    ChipDoc v3 on JCOP 4 P71 in ICAO EAC with PACE configuration
                                                Security Target Lite
                           Version                    Revision 1.0
                           Date                       2020-02-12
                           Product Type               Java Card Applet
                           TOE Name                   ChipDoc v3 on JCOP 4 P71 in ICAO EAC with PACE configuration
                                                      Version 3.0.0.52
                           CC Version                 Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation Version
                                                      3.1, Revision 5, April 2017 (Part 1 [1], Part 2 [2] and Part 3 [3])




                 1.2 TOE Overview




                             Fig 1.   Components of the TOE




                                          All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                             Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  3 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite




                       The TOE consists of an applet which is executed by a software stack that is stored on a
                       Micro Controller. For a complete picture of the TOE see Figure 1, and for details with
                       regards to the different components see section 1.3.1.
                       The protection profiles [5] and [6] define the security objectives and requirements for the
                       contactless chip of machine readable travel documents (MRTD) based on the
                       requirements and recommendations of the International Civil Aviation Organization
                       (ICAO). This ST extends this PP to contact, contactless and dual interface smartcard
                       modules. It addresses the advanced security methods Basic Access Control (BAC),
                       Standard Inspection Procedure (PACE), Extended Access Control (EAC) and Chip
                       Authentication similar to the Active Authentication in the Technical reports of ‘ICAO Doc
                       9303’ [11] and [12] for SAC (also known as PACE mechanism defined in [6]).
                       ChipDoc v3 passport application is configurable in BAC or EAC with PACE chip
                       authentication modes, with or without Active Authentication [11]. Also, it supports contact
                       and contactless communication.
                       This ST applies to the EAC with PACE configuration with or without Active
                       Authentication.
                       Note that there is no non-TOE hardware/software/firmware that is required by the TOE.


               1.2.1 TOE Usage and Security Features for Operational Use
                       The ChipDoc v3 application offers variety of applications like electronic identification
                       (eID), electronic driver’s license (eDL) or electronic passport (ePP), subject of the current
                       TOE.
                       A State or Organization issues MRTDs to be used by the holder for international travel.
                       The traveler presents a MRTD to the inspection system to prove his or her identity. The
                       MRTD in context of this TOE contains (i) visual (eye readable) biographical data and
                       portrait of the holder, (ii) a separate data summary (MRZ data) for visual and machine
                       reading using OCR methods in the Machine readable zone (MRZ) and (iii) data elements
                       on the MRTD’s chip (such as CAN for PACE authentication) according to LDS for
                       contactless machine reading. The authentication of the traveler is based on (i) the
                       possession of a valid MRTD personalized for a holder with the claimed identity as given
                       on the biographical data page and (ii) optional biometrics using the reference data stored
                       in the MRTD. The issuing State or Organization ensures the authenticity of the data of
                       genuine MRTD’s. The receiving State trusts a genuine MRTD of an issuing State or
                       Organization.
                       The issuing State or Organization implements security features of the MRTD to maintain
                       the authenticity and integrity of the MRTD and their data. The MRTD as the passport
                       book and the MRTD’s chip is uniquely identified by the Document Number.
                       The physical MRTD is protected by physical security measures (e.g. watermark on
                       paper, security printing), logical (e.g. authentication keys of the MRTD’s chip) and
                       organizational security measures (e.g. control of materials, personalization procedures)
                       [11]. These security measures include the binding of the MRTD’s chip to the passport
                       book.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  4 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                           ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite



                       The logical MRTD is protected in authenticity and integrity by a digital signature created
                       by the document signer acting for the issuing State or Organization and the security
                       features of the MRTD’s chip.
                       The ICAO defines the baseline security methods (Passive Authentication) and the
                       optional advanced security methods (BAC and/or SAC to the logical MRTD, Active
                       Authentication of the MRTD’s chip, EAC to the logical MRTD and the Data Encryption of
                       additional sensitive biometrics) as optional security measure in the ‘ICAO Doc 9303’ [11].
                       The Passive Authentication Mechanism and the Data Encryption are performed
                       completely and independently on the TOE by the TOE environment.
                       This TOE addresses the protection of the logical MRTD (i) in integrity by write only- once
                       access control and by physical means, and (ii) in confidentiality by the EAC Mechanism.
                       This TOE addresses the AA as an optional security mechanism.

                 1.3 TOE Description
               1.3.1 General
                       The TOE is an MRTD IC where application software is loaded to FLASH, and the TOE
                       can be assembled in a variety of form factors. The main form factor is the electronic
                       passport, a paper book passport embedding a contactless module.
                       The followings are an informal and non-exhaustive list of example graphic
                       representations of possible end products embedding the TOE:
                           • Contactless interface cards and modules
                           • Dual interface cards and modules
                           • Contact only cards and modules
                       The scope of this TOE is covered in section 1.3.1 above.
                       The TOE is linked to a MRTD reader via its HW and physical interfaces.
                           • The contactless type interface of the TOE smartcard is ISO/IEC 14443 compliant.
                           • The optional contact type interface of the TOE smartcard is ISO/IEC 7816 compliant.
                           • The optional interfaces of the TOE SOIC-8 are ISO 9141 compliant.
                           • The optional interfaces of the TOE QNF-44 are JEDEC compliant.
                       There are no other external interfaces of the TOE except the ones described above.
                       The antenna and the packaging, including their external interfaces, are out of the
                       scope of this TOE.
                       The TOE may be applied to a contact reader or to a contactless reader, depending on
                       the external interface type(s) available in its form factor. The readers are connected to a
                       computer and allow application programs (APs) to use the TOE.
                       The TOE can embed other secure functionalities, but they are not in the scope of this
                       TOE and subject to an evaluation in other TOEs.
               1.3.2 MRTD’s Chip
                       For this TOE the MRTD is viewed as unit of




                                        All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                           Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  5 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                             ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                       Security Target Lite



                           1. The physical MRTD as travel document in form of paper, plastic and chip. It
                              presents visual readable data including (but not limited to) personal data of the
                              MRTD holder
                              a. the biographical data on the biographical data page of the passport book,
                              b. the printed data in the Machine Readable Zone (MRZ) and
                              c. the printed portrait.
                           2. The logical MRTD as data of the MRTD holder stored according to the Logical Data
                              Structure [11] as specified by ICAO on the contactless integrated circuit. It presents
                              contactless readable data including (but not limited to) personal data of the MRTD
                              holder
                              a. the digital Machine Readable Zone Data (digital MRZ data, EF.DG1),
                              b. the digitized portraits (EF.DG2),
                              c. the biometric reference data of finger(s) (EF.DG3) or iris image(s) (EF.DG4) or
                                 both,
                              d. the other data according to LDS (EF.DG5 to EF.DG16) and
                              e. the Document security object.
                       This TOE addresses the protection of the logical MRTD:
                           • in integrity by write-only-once access control and by physical means, and
                           • in confidentiality by the SAC and Extended Access Control Mechanism.
                       This TOE addresses the Chip Authentication described in [12] as an alternative to the
                       Active Authentication stated in [11].
               1.3.3 Basic Access Control
                       The confidentiality by Basic Access Control (BAC) is a mandatory security feature that is
                       implemented by the TOE. For BAC, the inspection system
                              (i) reads optically the MRTD,
                              (ii) authenticates itself as an inspection system by means of Document Basic Access
                                    Keys.
                       After successful authentication of the inspection system the MRTD’s chip provides read
                       access to the logical MRTD by means of private communication (secure messaging) with
                       this inspection system [11], normative appendix 5.
                       In compliance with the ICAO Extended protection profile [5], this ST requires the TOE to
                       implement the Chip Authentication defined in [12]. The Chip Authentication prevents data
                       traces described in [11], informative appendix 7, A7.3.3. The Chip Authentication is
                       provided by the following steps:
                              (i) the inspection system communicates by means of secure messaging established
                                   by Basic Access Control,
                              (ii) the inspection system reads and verifies by means of the Passive Authentication
                                    the authenticity of the MRTD’s Chip Authentication Public Key using the
                                    Document Security Object,
                              (iii) the inspection system generates an ephemeral key pair,




                                          All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                             Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  6 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                           (iv) the TOE and the inspection system agree on two session keys for secure
                                messaging in ENC_MAC mode according to the Diffie-Hellman Primitive and
                           (v) the inspection system verifies by means of received message authentication
                                codes whether the MRTD’s chip was able or not to run this protocol properly (i.e.
                                the TOE proves to be in possession of the Chip Authentication Private Key
                                corresponding to the Chip Authentication Public Key used for derivation of the
                                session keys).
                       The Chip Authentication requires collaboration of the TOE and the TOE environment.
               1.3.4 PACE
                       The confidentiality by Password Authenticated Access Control (PACE) is a mandatory
                       security feature of the TOE. The travel document shall strictly conform to the “Common
                       Criteria Protection Profile Machine Readable Travel Document using Standard Inspection
                       Procedure with PACE (PACE PP)” [6]. Note that [6] considers high attack potential.
                       For the PACE protocol according to [14], the following steps shall be performed:
                           (i) The travel document’s chip encrypts a nonce with the shared password, derived
                                from the MRZ resp. CAN data and transmits the encrypted nonce together with
                                the domain parameters to the terminal
                           (ii) The terminal recovers the nonce using the shared password, by (physically)
                                 reading the MRZ resp. CAN data.
                           (iii) The travel document’s chip and terminal computer perform a Diffie-Hellman key
                                 agreement together with the ephemeral domain parameters to create a shared
                                 secret. Both parties derive the session keys KMAC and KENC from the shared
                                 secret.
                           (iv) Each party generates an authentication token, sends it to the other party and
                                verifies the received token.
               1.3.5 Extended Access Control
                       In compliance with the ICAO Extended protection profile [5], this ST requires the TOE to
                       implement the Extended Access Control as defined in [12]. The Extended Access Control
                       consists of two parts:
                           (i) the Chip Authentication Protocol and
                           (ii) the Terminal Authentication Protocol.
                       The Chip Authentication Protocol:
                           (i) authenticates the MRTD’s chip to the inspection system and
                           (ii) establishes secure messaging which is used by Terminal Authentication to protect
                                 the confidentiality and integrity of the sensitive biometric reference data during
                                 their transmission from the TOE to the inspection system.
                       Therefore Terminal Authentication can only be performed if Chip Authentication has been
                       successfully executed. The Terminal Authentication Protocol consists of
                           (i) the authentication of the inspection system as entity authorized by the receiving
                                State or Organization through the issuing State, and




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  7 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                           ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite



                             (ii) an access control by the TOE to allow reading the sensitive biometric reference
                                   data only to successfully authenticated authorized inspection systems.
                       The issuing State or Organization authorizes the receiving State by means of certification
                       the authentication public keys of Document Verifiers who create Inspection System
                       Certificate.
               1.3.6 Active Authentication
                       This TOE offers an optional mechanism called Active Authentication and specified in [12]
                       section 1.2. This security feature is a digital security feature that prevents cloning by
                       introducing a chip-individual key pair:
                             (i) The public key is stored in data group DG15 and thus protected by Passive
                                  Authentication.
                             (ii) The corresponding private key is stored in secure memory and may only be used
                                   internally by the MRTD chip and cannot be read out.
                       Thus, the chip can prove knowledge of this private key in a challenge-response protocol,
                       which is called Active Authentication. In this protocol the MRTD chip digitally signs a
                       challenge randomly chosen by the inspection system. The inspection system recognizes
                       that the MRTD chip is genuine if and only if the returned signature is correct. Active
                       Authentication is a straightforward protocol and prevents cloning very effectively but
                       introduces a privacy threat: Challenge Semantics (see Appendix F for a discussion on
                       Challenge Semantics).
               1.3.7 TOE Components and Composite Certification
                       The certification of this TOE is a composite certification. This means that for the
                       certification of this TOE other certifications of components which are part of this TOE are
                       re-used. In the following sections more detailed descriptions of the components of Figure
                       1 are provided. In the description it is also made clear whether a component is covered
                       by a previous certification or whether it is covered in the certification of this TOE.
                       Micro Controller
                       The Micro Controller is a secure smart card controller from NXP’s SmartMX3 family. The
                       Micro Controller contains a co-processor for symmetric cryptographic operations,
                       supporting DES and AES, as well as an accelerator for asymmetric cryptographic
                       algorithms. The Micro Controller further contains a physical random number generator.
                       The supported memory technologies are volatile (Random Access Memory (RAM)) and
                       non-volatile (Read Only Memory (ROM) and FLASH) memory.
                       Access to all memory types is controlled by a Memory Management Unit (MMU) which
                       allows to separate and restrict access to parts of the memory.
                       The Micro Controller has been certified in a previous certification and the results are re-
                       used for this certification. The exact reference to the previous certification is given in the
                       following table:

                       Table 2.    Reference to Certified Micro Controller with IC Dedicated Software and Crypto
                                   Library
                           Name                   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller N7121 with IC Dedicated
                                                  Software and Crypto Library




                                        All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                           Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  8 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                                 ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                           Security Target Lite



                           Certification ID                         BSI-DSZ-CC-1040
                           Reference                                [26]

                       Security IC Dedicated IC Software
                       Micro Controller Firmware
                       The Micro Controller Firmware is used for testing of the Micro Controller at production,
                       for booting of the Micro Controller after power-up or after reset, for configuration of
                       communication devices and for writing data to volatile and non-volatile memory.
                       The Micro Controller Firmware has been certified together with the Micro Controller (refer
                       to Table 2) and the same references [26] as given for the Micro Controller also apply for
                       the Micro Controller Firmware.
                       Crypto Library
                       The Crypto Library provides implementations for symmetric and asymmetric
                       cryptographic operations, hashing, the generation of hybrid deterministic and hybrid
                       physical random numbers and further tools like secure copy and compare. The
                       symmetric cryptographic operations comprise the algorithms 3DES, AES and
                       KoreanSEED, where these algorithms use the symmetric co-processor of the Micro
                       Controller. The supported asymmetric cryptographic operations are ECC and RSA.
                       These algorithms use the Public Key Crypto Coprocessor (PKCC) of the Micro Controller
                       for the cryptographic operations.
                       The Crypto Library has been certified together with the Micro Controller (refer to Table 2)
                       and the same references [26] as given for the Micro Controller also apply.
                       Security IC Embedded Software
                       JCOP 4 P71
                       The Operating System consists of JCVM, JCRE, JCAPI and GP framework. It is
                       implemented according to the Java Card Specification and GlobalPlatform and has been
                       certified in the course of a previous certification, where the results are re-used for this
                       certification. The exact reference to the certification is given in the following table:

                       Table 3.        Reference to certified Platform
                       Name                                       JCOP 4 P71
                           Configurations relevant for this TOE                        JCOP 4 P71 v4.7 R1.00.4
                                                                                       JCOP 4 P71 v4.7 R1.01.4
                           Certification ID                                            NSCIB-CC-180212
                           Reference                                                   [27]

                       ChipDoc v3 application:
                       The Target of Evaluation (TOE) is the integrated circuit chip of machine readable travel
                       documents (MRTD’s chip) programmed according to the Logical Data Structure (LDS)
                       [11] and providing the EAC and SAC mechanisms according to the ‘ICAO Doc 9303’ [11]
                       and BSI TR-03110 [15], respectively.
                       The TOE comprises at least:
                            • the circuitry of the MRTD’s chip (N7121 IC)




                                              All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                                 Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                  9 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                               ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                         Security Target Lite



                            • the IC Embedded Software (JCOP 4 P71 Operating System)
                            • the MRTD application (ChipDoc v3 applet in ICAO configuration)
                            • the associated guidance documentation
               1.3.8 TOE Lifecycle
                       The TOE lifecycle is shown in Fig 2 TOE Life Cycle. Described in terms of the four life
                       cycle phases (subdivided to 7 steps) mentioned in PP0055 [3], but with a refinement in
                       pre-personalisation, to support platform patching by the MRTD manufacturer who
                       operates from a CC certified site.
                       The IC Developer, IC Manufacturer as well as the MRTD Embedded Software Developer
                       of this TOE is NXP Semiconductors. In particular the software development for this
                       composite TOE took place at “NXP Gratkorn, Mikron-Weg 1, A-8101 Gratkorn, Austria”.
                       All other sites contributing to the Lifecycle of this TOE can be read from the certification
                       report of the underlying IC1.
                       Phase 1 “Development”
                       (Step 1 – IC Design)
                       The IC developer develops the integrated circuit, the IC Dedicated Software and the
                       guidance documentation associated with these TOE components.
                       (Step 2 – Embedded Software Design)
                       The embedded software developer uses the guidance documentation for the integrated
                       circuit and the guidance documentation for relevant parts of the IC Dedicated Software
                       and develops the operating system, the MRTD application and the guidance
                       documentation associated with these TOE components.
                       Phase 2 “Manufacturing”
                       (Step 3 – IC Manufacturing)
                       In the first instance the TOE integrated circuit is produced containing the MRTD’s chip
                       Dedicated Software and the parts of the MRTD’s chip Embedded Software in the non-
                       volatile non-programmable memories (ROM). The IC manufacturer programs IC
                       Identification Data onto the chip to control the IC as MRTD material during the IC
                       manufacturing and the delivery process to the MRTD manufacturer. The IC is securely
                       delivered from the IC manufacturer to the MRTD manufacturer.
                       (Step 4 – IC Initialisation)
                       The Embedded Software which constitutes the Operating System and the Card Content
                       Manager is enabled with the requisite keys loaded and transport mechanisms enabled,
                       which supports the secure transport of the IC from NXP manufacturing facility to the
                       MRTD Manufacturer facility.




                              1
                       1.         BSI-DSZ-CC-1040

                                            All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                               Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                10 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite




  Fig 2.   TOE Life Cycle



                       (Step 5 - PrePersonalisation)
                       During the step Pre-Perso, the MRTD manufacturer
                            (i) creates the MRTD application and
                            (ii) equips MRTD’s chips with pre-personalization Data.
                       IC Pre-Personalization
                       To create the application, it is necessary to instantiate the applet and create an MRTD
                       file system. In addition to the certified MRTD file system, one or more additional file
                       systems may be present on the TOE. This allows the TOE user to switch between more
                       than one (potentially certified) file systems or configurations of the application. Since the
                       ChipDoc v3 application offers electronic identity, driving license or SSCD functionalities
                       in addition to MRTD, the associated file systems may coexist on the TOE.
                       Any platform patching required is completed at this point. For e-passport products, Card
                       Content Management is finalized in this phase, thus post issuance applet loading is
                       disabled and the platform closed to further amendments.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                11 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                            ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                      Security Target Lite



                       The pre-personalized MRTD together with the IC Identifier is securely delivered from the
                       MRTD manufacturer to the Personalization Agent. NXP or the MRTD Manufacturer also
                       provides the relevant parts of the guidance documentation to the Personalization Agent.
                       (Packaging)
                       The MRTD manufacturer combines the IC with hardware for the contactless interface in
                       the passport book.
                       IC Packaging
                       MRTD Manufacturing
                       This step corresponds to the integration of the hardware and firmware components into
                       the final product body. The TOE is protected during transfer between various parties. IC
                       Packaging and MRTD Manufacturing are not part of the scope of this TOE.
                       Phase 3 “Personalization of the MRTD”
                       (Step 6 - Personalization)
                       The personalization of the MRTD includes:
                           • the survey of the MRTD holder’s biographical data,
                           • the enrolment of the MRTD holder biometric reference data,
                           • the printing of the visual readable data onto the physical MRTD,
                           • the writing of the TOE User Data and TSF Data into the logical MRTD and
                           • configuration of the TSF if necessary.
                       The step 6 is performed by the Personalization Agent and includes but is not limited to
                       the creation of the digital MRZ data (EF.DG1), the digitized portrait (EF.DG2), the
                       biometric reference data of finger(s) (EF.DG3) or iris image(s) (EF.DG4) or both, the
                       other data according to LDS (EF.DG5 to EF.DG16) and the Document security object.
                       The signing of the Document security object by the Document signer [11] finalizes the
                       personalization of the genuine MRTD for the MRTD holder. The personalized MRTD
                       (together with appropriate guidance for TOE use if necessary) is handed over to the
                       MRTD holder for operational use.
                       Personalization – 3rd Party Personalization facility
                       The TOE is protected during transfer between various parties by the confidential
                       information which resides in the card during mask production.
                       In case the personalization is done by 3rd party personalization facility, the
                       Personalization phase is not part of the scope of this TOE.
                       Phase 4 “Operational Use”
                       Where upon the card is delivered to the MRTD holder and until MRTD is expired or
                       destroyed.
                       (Step 7)
                       The TOE is used as MRTD chip by the traveler and the inspection systems in the
                       “Operational Use” phase. The user data can be read according to the security policy of
                       the issuing State or Organization and can be used according to the security policy of the
                       issuing State but they can never be modified.




                                         All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                            Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                12 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                                ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite



                       The Operational Use phase is not part of the scope of this TOE.
               1.3.9 TOE Identification
                       TOE Delivery
                       The delivery comprises the following items:

                       Table 4.         Delivery Items
                       Type                 Name                                                                          Version Form of delivery
                           JCOP 4 P71        NXP Secure Smart Card Controller N7121                                       R1.00.4 Micro Controller
                           Platform          with IC Dedicated Software and Crypto                                        R1.01.4 including on-chip
                                             Library                                                                              software: Firmware,
                                             ROM Code (Platform ID)                                                               Crypto Library and
                                                                                                                                  JCOP 4 Operating
                                             FLASH content (FLASH ID)
                                                                                                                                  System
                                             Patch Code (Patch ID)
                           ChipDoc v3        FLASH content                                                                3.0.0.52 Application software
                           application                                                                                             loaded onto the IC
                           Document          ChipDoc 3.0 User Guide Manual [28]                                           2.5      Electronic Document
                           Document          ChipDoc 3.0 ICAO Personalization Guide [29] 2.5                                       Electronic Document

                       Identification of the TOE
                       The TOE can be identified by
                              •       identifying the JCOP 4 P71 platform: The IDENTIFY command shall be sent to
                                      the TOE to verify the correct values of Platform ID, the FLASH ID and the Patch
                                      ID as stated in section "2.2 Platform identification" of the Personalization
                                      Guidance for this TOE [29].
                              •       identifying the ICAO application: The ChipDoc v3 application and the specific
                                      TOE configuration (ICAO EAC) can be verified according the respective
                                      instructions in section “2. Identification” of the Personalization Guidance for this
                                      TOE [29].


             1.3.10 Evaluated Package Types
                       A number of package types are supported for this TOE. All package types, which are
                       covered by the certification of the used platform (see [27]), are also allowed to be used in
                       combination with each product of this TOE.
                       The package types do not influence the security functionality of the TOE. They only
                       define which pads are connected in the package and for what purpose and in which
                       environment the chip can be used. Note that the security of the TOE is not dependent on
                       which pad is connected or not - the connections just define how the product can be used.
                       If the TOE is delivered as wafer the customer can choose the connection on his own.




                                             All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.                © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                                Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                           13 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                            ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                      Security Target Lite



2. Conformance Claims
                 2.1 CC Conformance Claim
                       The ST claims compliance with the following references:
                           • Common Criteria Version 3.1 Part 1 [1]
                           • Common Criteria Version 3.1 Part 2 [2] extended
                           • Common Criteria Version 3.1 Part 3 [3] conformant
                       Extensions are based on the Protection Profiles (PP [5] and PP [6]) presented in the next
                       section:
                           • FAU_SAS.1 ‘Audit data storage’
                           • FCS_RND.1 ‘Generation of random numbers’
                           • FIA_API.1 ‘Authentication Proof of Identity’
                           • FMT_LIM.1 ‘Limited capabilities’
                           • FMT_LIM.2 ‘Limited availability’
                           • FPT_EMSEC.1 ‘TOE emanation’

                 2.2 Package Claim
                       This Security Target claims conformance to the assurance package EAL5 augmented.
                       The augmentations to EAL5 are:
                           • ALC_DVS.2, and
                           • AVA_VAN.5

                 2.3 PP Claim
                       This ST claims strict conformance to the following Protection Profiles:
                           Protection Profile [5]
                           Common Criteria Protection Profile Machine Readable Travel Document with
                           “ICAO Application”, Extended Access Control with PACE (EAC PP)
                           Version             1.3.2
                           Date                05th December 2012
                           Prepared by         Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (BSI)
                           Identification      PP0056V2
                           Approved by         Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (BSI)
                           Registration        BSI-CC-PP-0056-V2-2012
                           Assurance Level     Common Criteria 3.1 EAL 4 augmented by ALC_DVS.2,
                                               ATE_DPT.2 and AVA_VAN.5


                           Protection Profile [6]
                           Common Criteria Protection Profile Machine Readable Travel Document using
                           Standard Inspection Procedure with PACE (PACE PP)
                           Version             1.01




                                         All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                            Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                14 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                           Date                     22nd July 2014
                           Prepared by              Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (BSI)
                           Identification           PP0068V2
                           Approved by              Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (BSI)
                           Registration             BSI-CC-PP-0068-V2-2011-MA-01
                           Assurance Level          Common Criteria 3.1 EAL 4 augmented by ALC_DVS.2,
                                                    ATE_DPT.2 and AVA_VAN.5


                       The ICAO SAC and EAC PPs define the security objectives and requirements for the
                       contactless chip of machine readable travel documents (MRTD) based on the
                       requirements and recommendations of the International Civil Aviation Organization
                       (ICAO). It addresses the advanced security methods SAC and Extended Access Control
                       and Chip Authentication similar to the Active Authentication in the Technical reports of
                       ‘ICAO Doc 9303’ [11] along with its supplements [13] and [14].
                       This MRTD’s IC does not limit the TOE interfaces to contactless: both contact and
                       contactless interfaces are part of this TOE and the PP content has been enhanced for
                       this purpose.
                       Additions to the claims from the PPs [5] [6] have been added to the related sections of
                       this Security Target and are listed including rationales in section 8.4 of this Security
                       Target.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                15 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                           ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                     Security Target Lite



3. Security Problem Definition
                 3.1 Assets
                       The assets to be protected by the TOE include the User Data on the travel document’s
                       chip, user data transferred between the TOE and the terminal, and travel document
                       tracing data.


                       Logical travel document sensitive User Data
                       Sensitive biometric reference data (Integrity and Confidentiality):
                           • EF.DG3: Biometric Finger(s)
                           • EF.DG4: Biometric Eye(s) Iris


                       Logical MRTD data
                       The ‘ICAO Doc 9303’ [11] requires that Basic Inspection Systems must have access to
                       the following logical data which integrity should always be preserved (integrity,
                       Confidentiality and Authenticity when PACE is used):
                           • EF.COM: Common Data Elements, lists the existing EF with the user data
                           • EF.SOD: Document Security Object according to LDS [11] used by the inspection
                             system for Passive Authentication of the logical MRTD
                           • EF.DG1: document’s data (Type, Issuing State or Organization, Number, Expiry
                             Date, Optional Data), holder’s data (Name, Nationality, Date of Birth, Sex) and Check
                             Digits
                           • EF.DG2: Encoded Face (Global Interchange Feature)
                           • EF.DG5: Biometric Face
                           • EF.DG7: Displayed Signature or Usual Mark
                           • EF.DG8: Displayed Portrait
                           • EF.DG9: Data Feature(s)
                           • EF.DG10: Structure Feature(s)
                           • EF.DG11: Additional Personal Detail(s)
                           • EF.DG12: Additional Document Detail(s)
                           • EF.DG13: optional Detail(s)
                           • EF.DG14: Security Info (Chip Authentication Public Key Info)
                           • EF.DG15: Active Authentication Public Key Info
                           • EF.DG16: Person(s) to Notify
                       Due to interoperability reasons with ‘ICAO Doc 9303’ [11], the TOE specifies the BAC
                       mechanisms with resistance against enhanced basic attack potential granting access to:
                           • Logical MRTD standard User Data (i.e. Personal Data) of the MRTD holder (EF.DG1,
                             EF.DG2, EF.DG5 to EF.DG13, EF.DG16) (DG6 is absent),




                                        All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                           Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                16 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                            ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                      Security Target Lite



                           • Chip Authentication Public Key in EF.DG14,
                           • Active Authentication Public Key in EF.DG15,
                           • Document Security Object (SOD) in EF.SOD,
                           • Common data in EF.COM.
                       The TOE prevents read access to sensitive User Data
                           • Sensitive biometric reference data (EF.DG3, EF.DG4).


                       Authenticity of the MRTD’s chip
                       The authenticity of the MRTD’s chip personalized by the issuing State or Organization for
                       the MRTD holder is used by the traveler to prove his possession of a genuine MRTD.
                       This authenticity relies on the confidentiality and integrity of data such as the Active
                       Authentication Public Key, PACE key, EF.CARDACCESS info or the Chip Authentication
                       Private Key.


                       Additional assets from the PACE PP
                       The primary assets
                           • User data stored on the TOE,
                           • User data transferred between the TOE and the terminal connected, and
                           • Travel document tracing data,
                       And the secondary assets
                           • Accessibility to the TOE functions and data only for authorized subjects,
                           • Genuineness of the TOE,
                           • TOE internal secret cryptographic keys,
                           • TOE internal non-secret cryptographic material, and
                           • Travel document communication establishment authorization data.



                 3.2 Subjects
                       This Security Target considers the following subjects:
                       S.Manufacturer
                       The generic term for the IC Manufacturer producing the integrated circuit and the MRTD
                       Manufacturer completing the IC to the MRTD’s chip. The Manufacturer is the default user
                       of the TOE during the Phase 2 Manufacturing. The TOE does not distinguish between
                       the users IC Manufacturer and MRTD Manufacturer using this role Manufacturer.
                       S.Personalizer              Personalization Agent
                       The agent is acting on behalf of the issuing State or Organization to personalize the
                       MRTD for the holder by some or all of the following activities: (i) establishing the identity
                       of the holder for the biographic data in the MRTD, (ii) enrolling the biometric reference




                                         All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                            Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                17 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                       data of the MRTD holder i.e. the portrait, the encoded finger image(s) and/or the
                       encoded iris image(s), (iii) writing these data on the physical and logical MRTD for the
                       holder as defined for global, international and national interoperability, (iv) writing the
                       initial TSF data and (v) signing the Document Security Object defined in [11].
                       S.Country      Country Verifying Certification Authority
                       The Country Verifying Certification Authority (CVCA) enforces the privacy policy of the
                       issuing State or Organization with respect to the protection of sensitive biometric
                       reference data stored in the MRTD. The CVCA represents the country specific root of the
                       PKI of Inspection Systems and creates the Document Verifier Certificates within this PKI.
                       The updates of the public key of the CVCA are distributed in the form of Country
                       Verifying CA Link-Certificates.
                       S.DV         Document Verifier
                       The Document Verifier (DV) enforces the privacy policy of the receiving State with
                       respect to the protection of sensitive biometric reference data to be handled by the
                       Extended Inspection Systems. The Document Verifier manages the authorization of the
                       Extended Inspection Systems for the sensitive data of the MRTD in the limits provided by
                       the issuing States or Organizations in the form of the Document Verifier Certificates.
                       S.Terminal
                       A terminal is any technical system communicating with the TOE through its physical
                       interfaces.
                       S.IS-PACE      Inspection system
                       A technical system used by the border control officer of the receiving State (i) examining
                       an MRTD presented by the traveler and verifying its authenticity and (ii) verifying the
                       traveler as MRTD holder. The Basic Inspection System (BIS) (i) contains a terminal for
                       the communication with the MRTD’s chip, (ii) implements the terminals part of the Basic
                       Access Control Mechanism and (iii) gets the authorization to read the logical MRTD
                       under the Basic Access Control by optical reading the MRTD or other parts of the
                       passport book providing this information. The General Inspection System (GIS) is a
                       Basic Inspection System which implements additionally the Chip Authentication
                       Mechanism. The IS-PACE implements the terminal’s part of the PACE protocol and
                       authenticates itself to the travel document using a shared password (PACE password)
                       and supports Passive Authentication. The Extended Inspection System (EIS) in
                       addition to the General Inspection System (i) implements the Terminal Authentication
                       Protocol and (ii) is authorized by the issuing State or Organization through the Document
                       Verifier of the receiving State to read the sensitive biometric reference data. The security
                       attributes of the EIS are defined of the Inspection System Certificates.
                       S.Holder       MRTD Holder
                       The rightful holder of the MRTD for whom the issuing State or Organization personalized
                       the MRTD.
                       S.Traveler
                       Person presenting the MRTD to the inspection system and claiming the identity of the
                       MRTD holder.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                18 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                 3.3 Assumptions
                       The assumptions describe the security aspects of the environment in which the TOE will
                       be used or is intended to be used.
                       A.Insp_Sys          Inspection Systems for global interoperability
                       The Extended Inspection System (EIS) for global interoperability (i) includes the Country
                       Signing CA Public Key and (ii) implements the terminal part of PACE and/or BAC (with
                       optional Active Authentication). BAC may only be used if supported by the TOE. If both
                       PACE and BAC are supported by the TOE and the IS, PACE must be used. The EIS
                       reads the logical travel document under PACE or BAC and performs the Chip
                       Authentication v.1 to verify the logical travel document and establishes secure
                       messaging. EIS supports the Terminal Authentication Protocol v.1 in order to ensure
                       access control and is authorized by the issuing State or Organisation through the
                       Document Verifier of the receiving State to read the sensitive biometric reference data.
                       A.Passive_Auth PKI for Passive Authentication
                       The issuing and receiving States or Organisations establish a public key infrastructure for
                       passive authentication i.e. digital signature creation and verification for the logical travel
                       document. The issuing State or Organisation runs a Certification Authority (CA) which
                       securely generates, stores and uses the Country Signing CA Key pair. The CA keeps the
                       Country Signing CA Private Key secret and is recommended to distribute the Country
                       Signing CA Public Key to ICAO, all receiving States maintaining its integrity. The
                       Document Signer
                           (i) generates the Document Signer Key Pair,
                           (ii) hands over the Document Signer Public Key to the CA for certification,
                           (iii) keeps the Document Signer Private Key secret and
                           (iv) uses securely the Document Signer Private Key for signing the Document
                                Security Objects of the travel documents. The CA creates the Document Signer
                                Certificates for the Document Signer Public Keys that are distributed to the
                                receiving States and Organisations. It is assumed that the Personalisation Agent
                                ensures that the Document Security Object contains only the hash values of
                                genuine user data.
                       A.Auth_PKI          PKI for Inspection Systems
                       The issuing and receiving States or Organisations establish a public key infrastructure for
                       card verifiable certificates of the Extended Access Control. The Country Verifying
                       Certification Authorities, the Document Verifier and Extended Inspection Systems hold
                       authentication key pairs and certificates for their public keys encoding the access control
                       rights. The Country Verifying Certification Authorities of the issuing States or
                       Organisations are signing the certificates of the Document Verifier and the Document
                       Verifiers are signing the certificates of the Extended Inspection Systems of the receiving
                       States or Organisations. The issuing States or Organisations distribute the public keys of
                       their Country Verifying Certification Authority to their travel document’s chip.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                19 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                 3.4 Threat agent
                                                 A threat agent trying
                                                         (i) to manipulate the logical travel document without authorization,
                                                         (ii) to read sensitive biometric reference data (i.e. EF.DG3,
                                                               EF.DG4),
                                                         (iii) to forge a genuine travel document, or
                           S.ATTACKER
                                                         (iv) to trace a travel document.
                                                 A threat agent trying to undermine the security policy defined by the
                                                 current Security Target, especially to change the properties of the
                                                 assets having to be maintained.
                                                 This threat agent has high attack potential.


                       Application note: An impostor is attacking the inspection system as TOE IT
                       environment independent on using a genuine, counterfeit or forged travel document.
                       Therefore the impostor may use r Recognition Arrangement
evidence adduced.                                                                                       recognition for components
                                                                                                        up to EAL 2 and ALC_FLR
This certificate is not an endorsement of the IT Product by the Federal Office for                                  only
Information Security or any other organisation that recognises or gives effect to this
certificate, and no warranty of the IT Product by the Federal Office for Information
Security or any other organisation that recognises or gives effect to this certificate, is
either expressed or implied.
Bonn, 12 February 2020
For the Federal Office for Information Security




Bernd Kowalski                              L.S.
Head of Division

                                   Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik
                       Godesberger Allee 185-189 - D-53175 Bonn -    Postfach 20 03 63 - D-53133 Bonn
                   Phone +49 (0)228 99 9582-0 - Fax +49 (0)228 9582-5477 - Infoline +49 (0)228 99 9582-111
Certification Report                                            BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020




                       This page is intentionally left blank.




                                                                                  4 / 33
BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020                                                                                        Certification Report




Contents
A. Certification......................................................................................................................6
   1.   Preliminary Remarks....................................................................................................6
   2.   Specifications of the Certification Procedure...............................................................6
   3.   Recognition Agreements..............................................................................................7
   4.   Performance of Evaluation and Certification................................................................8
   5.   Validity of the Certification Result.................................................................................8
   6.   Publication....................................................................................................................9
B. Certification Results.......................................................................................................10
   1. Executive Summary....................................................................................................11
   2. Identification of the TOE.............................................................................................12
   3. Security Policy............................................................................................................15
   4. Assumptions and Clarification of Scope.....................................................................15
   5. Architectural Information.............................................................................................16
   6. Documentation...........................................................................................................16
   7. IT Product Testing.......................................................................................................16
   8. Evaluated Configuration.............................................................................................17
   9. Results of the Evaluation............................................................................................18
   10. Obligations and Notes for the Usage of the TOE.....................................................19
   11. Security Target..........................................................................................................20
   12. Regulation specific aspects (eIDAS, QES)..............................................................20
   13. Definitions.................................................................................................................20
   14. Bibliography..............................................................................................................23
C. Excerpts from the Criteria..............................................................................................26

D. Annexes.........................................................................................................................27




                                                                                                                                 5 / 33
Certification Report                                                               BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020




A.      Certification

1.      Preliminary Remarks
Under the BSIG1 Act, the Federal Office for Information Security (BSI) has the task of
issuing certificates for information technology products.
Certification of a product is carried out on the instigation of the vendor or a distributor,
hereinafter called the sponsor.
A part of the procedure is the technical examination (evaluation) of the product according
to the security criteria published by the BSI or generally recognised security criteria.
The evaluation is normally carried out by an evaluation facility recognised by the BSI or by
BSI itself.
The result of the certification procedure is the present Certification Report. This report
contains among others the certificate (summarised assessment) and the detailed
Certification Results.
The Certification Results contain the technical description of the security functionality of
the certified product, the details of the evaluation (strength and weaknesses) and
instructions for the user.

2.      Specifications of the Certification Procedure
The certification body conducts the procedure according to the criteria laid down in the
following:
●   Act on the Federal Office for Information Security 1
●   BSI Certification and Approval Ordinance2
●   BSI Schedule of Costs 3
●   Special decrees issued by the Bundesministerium des Innern (Federal Ministry of the
    Interior)
●   DIN EN ISO/IEC 17065 standard
●   BSI certification: Scheme documentation describing the certification process (CC-
    Produkte) [3]
●   BSI certification: Scheme documentation on requirements for the Evaluation Facility, its
    approval and licencing process (CC-Stellen) [3]
●   Common Criteria for IT Security Evaluation (CC), Version 3.1 4 [1] also published as
    ISO/IEC 15408.

1
     Act on the Federal Office for Information Security (BSI-Gesetz - BSIG) of 14 August 2009,
     Bundesgesetzblatt I p. 2821
2
     Ordinance on the Procedure for Issuance of Security Certificates and approval by the Federal Office for
     Information Security (BSI-Zertifizierungs- und -Anerkennungsverordnung - BSIZertV) of 17 December
     2014, Bundesgesetzblatt 2014, part I, no. 61, p. 2231
3
     Schedule of Cost for Official Procedures of the Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik
     (BSI-Kostenverordnung, BSI-KostV) of 3 March 2005, Bundesgesetzblatt I, p. 519



                                                                                                           6 / 33
BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020                                                              Certification Report




●   Common Methodology for IT Security Evaluation (CEM), Version 3.1 [2] also published
    as ISO/IEC 18045
●   BSI certification: Application Notes and Interpretation of the Scheme (AIS) [4]

3.      Recognition Agreements
In order to avoid multiple certification of the same product in different countries a mutual
recognition of IT security certificates - as far as such certificates are based on ITSEC or
CC - under certain conditions was agreed.

3.1.    European Recognition of CC – Certificates (SOGIS-MRA)
The SOGIS-Mutual Recognition Agreement (SOGIS-MRA) Version 3 became effective in
April 2010. It defines the recognition of certificates for IT-Products at a basic recognition
level and, in addition, at higher recognition levels for IT-Products related to certain SOGIS
Technical Domains only.
The basic recognition level includes Common Criteria (CC) Evaluation Assurance Levels
EAL 1 to EAL 4. For "Smartcards and similar devices" a SOGIS Technical Domain is in
place. For "HW Devices with Security Boxes" a SOGIS Technical Domains is in place, too.
In addition, certificates issued for Protection Profiles based on Common Criteria are part of
the recognition agreement.
The current list of signatory nations and approved certification schemes, details on
recognition, and the history of the agreement can be seen on the website at
https://www.sogis.eu.
The SOGIS-MRA logo printed on the certificate indicates that it is recognised under the
terms of this agreement by the related bodies of the signatory nations. A disclaimer
beneath the logo indicates the specific scope of recognition.
This certificate is recognized under SOGIS-MRA for all assurance components selected.

3.2.    International Recognition of CC – Certificates (CCRA)
The international arrangement on the mutual recognition of certificates based on the CC
(Common Criteria Recognition Arrangement, CCRA-2014) has been ratified on 08
September 2014. It covers CC certificates based on collaborative Protection Profiles (cPP)
(exact use), CC certificates based on assurance components up to and including EAL 2 or
the assurance family Flaw Remediation (ALC_FLR) and CC certificates for Protection
Profiles and for collaborative Protection Profiles (cPP).
The current list of signatory nations and approved certification schemes can be seen on
the website: https://www.commoncriteriaportal.org.
The Common Criteria Recognition Arrangement logo printed on the certificate indicates
that this certification is recognised under the terms of this agreement by the related bodies
of the signatory nations. A disclaimer beneath the logo indicates the specific scope of
recognition.
This certificate is recognized according to the rules of CCRA-2014, i. e. up to and including
CC part 3 EAL 2+ ALC_FLR components.

4
     Proclamation of the Bundesministerium des Innern of 12 February 2007 in the Bundesanzeiger dated
     23 February 2007, p. 3730



                                                                                                    7 / 33
Certification Report                                                       BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020




4.      Performance of Evaluation and Certification
The certification body monitors each individual evaluation to ensure a uniform procedure, a
uniform interpretation of the criteria and uniform ratings.
The product Infineon Security Controller M7893 B11 with optional RSA2048/4096
v2.03.008, EC v2.03.008, SHA-2 v1.01, SCL v2.02.010 libraries and Toolbox v2.03.008
and with specific IC dedicated software (firmware), has undergone the certification
procedure at BSI. This is a re-certification based on BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V3-2018. Specific
results from the evaluation process BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V3-2018 were re-used.
The evaluation of the product Infineon Security Controller M7893 B11 with optional
RSA2048/4096 v2.03.008, EC v2.03.008, SHA-2 v1.01, SCL v2.02.010 libraries and
Toolbox v2.03.008 and with specific IC dedicated software (firmware), was conducted by
TÜV Informationstechnik GmbH. The evaluation was completed on 11 February 2020.
TÜV Informationstechnik GmbH is an evaluation facility (ITSEF) 5 recognised by the
certification body of BSI.
For this certification procedure the sponsor and applicant is: Infineon Technologies AG.
The product was developed by: Infineon Technologies AG.
The certification is concluded with the comparability check and the production of this
Certification Report. This work was completed by the BSI.

5.      Validity of the Certification Result
This Certification Report applies only to the version of the product as indicated. The
confirmed assurance package is valid on the condition that
●   all stipulations regarding generation, configuration and operation, as given in the
    following report, are observed,
●   the product is operated in the environment described, as specified in the following report
    and in the Security Target.
For the meaning of the assurance components and assurance levels please refer to CC
itself. Detailed references are listed in part C of this report.
The Certificate issued confirms the assurance of the product claimed in the Security Target
at the date of certification. As attack methods evolve over time, the resistance of the
certified version of the product against new attack methods needs to be re-assessed.
Therefore, the sponsor should apply for the certified product being monitored within the
assurance continuity program of the BSI Certification Scheme (e.g. by a re-assessment or
re-certification). Specifically, if results of the certification are used in subsequent evaluation
and certification procedures, in a system integration process or if a user's risk
management needs regularly updated results, it is recommended to perform a re-
assessment on a regular e.g. annual basis.
In order to avoid an indefinite usage of the certificate when evolved attack methods would
require a re-assessment of the products resistance to state of the art attack methods, the
maximum validity of the certificate has been limited. The certificate issued on 12 February
2020 is valid until 11 February 2025. Validity can be re-newed by re-certification.
The owner of the certificate is obliged:

5
     Information Technology Security Evaluation Facility



                                                                                             8 / 33
BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020                                                        Certification Report




     1. when advertising the certificate or the fact of the product's certification, to refer to
        the Certification Report as well as to provide the Certification Report, the Security
        Target and user guidance documentation mentioned herein to any customer of the
        product for the application and usage of the certified product,
     2. to inform the Certification Body at BSI immediately about vulnerabilities of the
        product that have been identified by the developer or any third party after issuance
        of the certificate,
     3. to inform the Certification Body at BSI immediately in the case that security relevant
        changes in the evaluated life cycle, e.g. related to development and production sites
        or processes, occur, or the confidentiality of documentation and information related
        to the Target of Evaluation (TOE) or resulting from the evaluation and certification
        procedure where the certification of the product has assumed this confidentiality
        being maintained, is not given any longer. In particular, prior to the dissemination of
        confidential documentation and information related to the TOE or resulting from the
        evaluation and certification procedure that do not belong to the deliverables
        according to the Certification Report part B, or for those where no dissemination
        rules have been agreed on, to third parties, the Certification Body at BSI has to be
        informed.
In case of changes to the certified version of the product, the validity can be extended to
the new versions and releases, provided the sponsor applies for assurance continuity (i.e.
re-certification or maintenance) of the modified product, in accordance with the procedural
requirements, and the evaluation does not reveal any security deficiencies.

6.      Publication
The product Infineon Security Controller M7893 B11 with optional RSA2048/4096
v2.03.008, EC v2.03.008, SHA-2 v1.01, SCL v2.02.010 libraries and Toolbox v2.03.008
and with specific IC dedicated software (firmware), has been included in the BSI list of
certified products, which is published regularly (see also Internet: https://www.bsi.bund.de
and [5]). Further information can be obtained from BSI-Infoline +49 228 9582-111.
Further copies of this Certification Report can be requested from the developer 6 of the
product. The Certification Report may also be obtained in electronic form at the internet
address stated above.




6
     Infineon Technologies AG
     Am Campeon 1-12
     85579 Neubiberg



                                                                                              9 / 33
Certification Report                                                    BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020




B.      Certification Results
The following results represent a summary of
●   the Security Target of the sponsor for the Target of Evaluation,
●   the relevant evaluation results from the evaluation facility, and
●   complementary notes and stipulations of the certification body.




                                                                                         10 / 33
BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020                                                           Certification Report




1.     Executive Summary
The Target of Evaluation (TOE) is an Infineon Security Controller M7893 B11 with optional
Software Library RSA2048/4096 v2.03.008, EC v2.03.008, SHA-2 v1.01, SCL v2.02.010
libraries, and Toolbox v2.03.008, as well as with specific IC dedicated software (firmware).
The TOE provides a real 16-bit CPU-architecture and is compatible to the 80251
microcontroller architecture. The major components of the core system are the two CPUs
(Central Processing Units), acting as one, the MMU (Memory Management Unit) and MED
(Memory Encryption/Decryption Unit). The dual interface controller is able to communicate
using either the contact based or the contactless interface.
The TOE consists of the hardware part, the firmware parts and the software parts.
The software parts are differentiated into the cryptographic libraries RSA, EC, and SHA-2,
symmetric cryptographic libraries and the supporting libraries Toolbox and Base. The Base
Library does not provide any specific security functionality on its own. However it is a
necessary perquisite in order to use the RSA, EC and Toolbox libraries.
This TOE is intended to be used in smart cards and other form factors for particularly
security-relevant applications and for its prevalent use as developing platform for smart
card operating systems. The term Smartcard Embedded Software is used in the following
for all operating systems and applications stored and executed on the TOE. The TOE is
the platform for the Smartcard Embedded Software.
The Security Target [6] is the basis for this certification. It is based on the certified
Protection Profile Security IC Platform Protection Profile, Version 1.0, 15 June 2007, BSI-
CC-PP-0035-2007 [8]. The TOE Security Functional Requirements are implemented by
the following TOE Security Functionality:
  TOE Security Functionality         Addressed issue
  SF_DPM                             Device Phase Management:
                                     The life cycle of the TOE is split up into several
                                     phases. Different operation modes help to protect
                                     the TOE during each phase of its lifecycle.
  SF_PS                              Protection against Snooping:
                                     The TOE uses various means to protect from
                                     snooping of memories and busses and prevents
                                     single stepping.
  SF_PMA                             Protection against Modifying Attacks:
                                     This TOE implements protection against
                                     modifying attacks of memories, alarm lines and
                                     sensors.
  SF_PLA                             Protection against Logical Attacks:
                                     The memory access control of the TOE uses a
                                     memory management unit (MMU) to control the
                                     access to the available physical memory by using
                                     virtual memory addresses and to segregate the
                                     code and data to a privilege level model. The
                                     MMU controls the address permissions of up
                                     seven privileged levels and gives the software the
                                     possibility to define different access rights. The
                                     address permissions of the privilege levels are




                                                                                                11 / 33
Certification Report                                                         BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020




  TOE Security Functionality           Addressed issue
                                       controlled by the MMU. In case of an access
                                       violation the MMU will trigger a reset and then a
                                       trap service routine can react on the access
                                       violation.
  SF_CS                                Cryptographic Support:
                                       The TOE is equipped with several hardware
                                       accelerators and software modules to support the
                                       standard      symmetric     and       asymmetric
                                       cryptographic operations. The components are a
                                       coprocessor supporting the DES and AES
                                       algorithms and a combination of a coprocessor
                                       and software modules to support RSA
                                       cryptography, RSA key generation, ECDSA
                                       signature generation and verification, ECDH key
                                       agreement and EC public key calculation and
                                       public key testing. Furthermore, the TOE is
                                       equipped with an optional SHA-2 library and
                                       HASH module as well as well as an AIS31
                                       conformant TRNG that meets the functionality
                                       class PTG.2. In addition the optional Symmetric
                                       library (SCL) provides a high-level interface to
                                       3DES and AES symmetric cryptographic
                                       operation implemented on the symmetric
                                       hardware coprocessor.

                               Table 1: TOE Security Functionalities
For more details please refer to the Security Target [6] and [9], chapter 8.
The assets to be protected by the TOE are defined in the Security Target [6] and [9],
chapter 4.1.2. Based on these assets the TOE Security Problem is defined in terms of
Assumptions, Threats and Organisational Security Policies. This is outlined in the Security
Target [6] and [9], chapter 4.
This certification covers the configurations of the TOE as outlined in chapter 8.
The vulnerability assessment results as stated within this certificate do not include a rating
for those cryptographic algorithms and their implementation suitable for encryption and
decryption (see BSIG Section 9, Para. 4, Clause 2).
The certification results only apply to the version of the product indicated in the certificate
and on the condition that all the stipulations are kept as detailed in this Certification
Report. This certificate is not an endorsement of the IT product by the Federal Office for
Information Security (BSI) or any other organisation that recognises or gives effect to this
certificate, and no warranty of the IT product by BSI or any other organisation that
recognises or gives effect to this certificate, is either expressed or implied.

2.      Identification of the TOE
The Target of Evaluation (TOE) is called:
 Infineon Security Controller M7893 B11 with optional RSA2048/4096 v2.03.008, EC
   v2.03.008, SHA-2 v1.01, SCL v2.02.010 libraries and Toolbox v2.03.008 and with
                     specific IC dedicated software (firmware),
The following table outlines the TOE deliverables:



                                                                                              12 / 33
BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020                                                                 Certification Report




           No Type        Identifier                    Release           Form of Delivery
           1    HW        M7893 Smart Card IC           B11 (produced in Complete modules, with or
                                                        Dresden)         without inlay mounting, with or
                                                                         without inlay antenna mounting,
                                                                         in form of plain wafers, in an IC
                                                                         case or in bare dies
           2    SW        RSA library (optional)        RSA2048           Object code in electronic form
                                                        v2.03.008
                                                        RSA4096
                                                        v2.03.008
           3    SW        EC library (optional)         EC v2.03.008      Object code in electronic form
           4    SW        SHA-2 library (optional)      SHA-2 v1.01       Object code in electronic form
           5    SW        Toolbox library (optional)    Toolbox           Object code in electronic form
                                                        v2.03.008
           6    SW        SCL library (optional)        v2.02.010         Object code in electronic form
           7    FW        STS Self Test Software (the   FW-identifier     Stored in test ROM on the IC
                          IC Dedicated Test Software)   78.019.03.4       (patch in SOLID FLASH)
           8    FW        RMS Resource              FW-identifier         Stored in reserved area of user
                          Management System (the IC 78.019.03.4           ROM on the IC (patch in SOLID
                          Dedicated Support                               FLASH)
                          Software)
           9    FW        Service Algorithm (SA)        FW-identifier     Stored in reserved area of user
                                                        78.019.03.4       ROM on the IC (patch in SOLID
                                                                          FLASH)
           10   FW        Flash Loader                  FW-identifier     Stored in reserved area of user
                                                        78.019.03.4       ROM and parts of it in SOLID
                                                                          FLASH on the IC (patch in
                                                                          SOLID FLASH)
           11   SW        ROM code (including           --                Stored in User ROM on the IC.
                          Embedded Software and
                                                                          Only in case the IC Embedded
                          crypto libraries)
                                                                          Software Developer provides
                                                                          Infineon with code for ROM.
           12   SW        NVM image (including          --                Stored in Flash memory on the
                          Embedded Software and                           IC.
                          crypto libraries)
                                                                          Only in case the IC Embedded
                                                                          Software Developer provides
                                                                          Infineon with code for Flash
                                                                          memory.
           13   DOC       SLx 70 Family Production      2015-04-01        Personalized pdf-file
                          and Personalization User’
                          Manual
           14   DOC       M7893 Hardware Reference 19-06-24               Personalized pdf-file
                          Manual 3.0
           15   DOC       M7893 Errata Sheet 4.2        2019-08-07        Personalized pdf-file
           16   DOC       M7893 Security Guidelines     2019-09-25        Personalized pdf-file
           17   DOC       16-bit Security Controller    2019-02-19        Personalized pdf-file
                          Family SLE 70
                          Programmer’s Reference
                          Manual 9.10




                                                                                                     13 / 33
Certification Report                                                            BSI-DSZ-CC-0879-V4-2020




             No Type    Identifier                    Release           Form of Delivery
             18   DOC   SLE70 Asymmetric Crypto       2019-07-15        Personalized pdf-file (optional)
                        Library for Crypto@2304T
                        RSA / ECC / Toolbox User
                        Interface (2.03.008)
             19   DOC   SCL78 Symmetric Crypto        2016-12-09        Personalized pdf-file (optional)
                        Library for SCP v3,
                        DES/AES, 16-bit Security
                        Controller, User Interface
                        (2.02.010)
             20   DOC   Crypto@2304T User Manual 2010-03-23             Personalized pdf-file
             21   DOC   SLx70 Family Secure Hash      2009-11-06        Personalized pdf-file (optional)
                        Algorithm SHA-2 (SHA
                        256/224, SHA 512/384)
                        Library Version V1.01
             22   DOC   AMM Advanced Mode NRG         2019-10-22        Personalized pdf-file (optional)
                        SAM Addendum 2.0

                                     Table 2: Deliverables of the TOE

The delivery documentation describes all procedures that are necessary to maintain
security when distributing versions of the TOE or parts of it to the user’s site including the
necessary intermediate delivery procedures.
Furthermore, the delivery documentation describes in a sufficient manner how the various
procedures and technical measures provide for the detection of modifications and any
discrepancies between the TOE respective parts of it send by the TOE Manufacturer and
the version received by the Composite Product Manufacturer.
Three different delivery procedures have to be taken into consideration:
    ●   Delivery of the IC dedicated software components (IC dedicated SW, guidance)
        from the TOE Manufacturer to the IC Embedded Software Developer.
    ●   Delivery of the IC Embedded Software (ROM / Flash data, initialisation and pre-
        personalisation data) from the IC Embedded Software Developer to the TOE
        Manufacturer.
    ●   Delivery of the final TOE from the TOE Manufacturer to the Composite Product
        Manufacturer. After phase 3 the TOE is delivered in form of wafers or sawn wafers,
        after phase 4 in form of modules (with or without inlay antenna).
Respective distribution centers are listed in Appendix B (see below).
The individuaific
configured, not flashed and not personalized TOE products to the user warehouse.
Extra authentication means applied in the PIN-Letter status of the Flash Loader preserve that only the intended
user with the intended PIN-Letter can configure with user specific information and enable the normal Flash
Loader functions in a second step. By that the user orders the products and receives - in a protected way - the
belonging PIN-Letter. PIN-Letter and delivered chips must match.
By delivery the user warehouse gets filled and depending on market demands the user can immediate apply the
authentication means of the PIN-letter. If passing, the TOE products become user specific configured and the
Flash Loader can be used for this specific user in a second step.
The following table outlines the different ways how the user can input his software on this TOE – a TOE without
user available ROM. User software comprises usually the operating system and applications, which are for
Infineon Technologies simply a user data package which is handled as a fixed data package during production.
This provides high process flexibility for the user of which an overview is given in the following table:


                         Table 2        Options to implement user software on the chip
 Case                          Option                                          Flash Loader Status
         The user or/and a subcontractor downloads the
         software into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM on his             The Flash Loader can be activated or reactivated
 1.      own. Infineon Technologies has not received user      by the user or subcontractor to download his
         software and there are no user data of the            software in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
         Composite TOE in the ROM.
         The user provides his complete software for the
         download into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to
                                                               The Flash Loader is permanently disabled prior
 2       Infineon Technologies AG. The software is
                                                               delivery.
         downloaded to the SOLID FLASH™ NVM during
         chip production.
                                                               When leaving the Infineon Technologies
                                                               production facility, the Flash Loader is blocked,
         The user provides software for the download into      but can be activated or reactivated by the user or
         the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to Infineon                      subcontractor to complete the previously stored
 3       Technologies AG. The software is downloaded to        software parts in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
         the SOLID FLASH™ NVM during chip
         production.                                           Precondition is that the user has provided an own
                                                               reactivation procedure in software prior chip
                                                               production to Infineon Technologies AG.

For the cases with active Flash Loader on board and whenever the user has finalized his SW-download,
respectively the TOE is in the final state and about to be delivered to the end-user, the user is obligated to lock
the Flash Loader. This locking is the final step and results in a permanent deactivation of the Flash Loader. This
means that once being in the locked status, the Flash Loader cannot be reactivated anymore.
Note that whenever a TOE comes without active Flash Loader, BPU and PIN-Letter process are not possible.
All in all various delivery combinations are given and for example, a product can come with a fix configuration
and with Flash Loader, to enable the user to download software, but without BPU option and with PIN-Letter.
The following cases can occur:

                         Table 3        Options with Flash Loader, BPU and PIN-Letter
CC Document                                              10                                                       1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


 Case           Order                                              Option
   1     Fix configuration,            Infineon Technologies configures and flashes all software as ordered.
         Flash Loader is               The entire user software must be delivered to Infineon Technologies
         locked (permanent)             prior production.
   2     Flash Loader                  Infineon configures the chip as ordered and
         functional, BPU               the user flashes his software at his own premises.
         feature blocked               If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also
                                        shares of the user software during production. These user software
                                        shares must be delivered to Infineon Technologies prior production.
                                        The user can finalize his software package at his premises.
   3     Flash Loader           The user:
         functional                 Activates the Flash Loader,
         and active BPU             configures the chip applying the BPU feature and
         feature
                                    flashes his software at his own premises.
                                    If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also
                                       shares of the user software during production. These user software
                                       shares must be delivered to Infineon Technologies prior production.
                                       The user can finalize his software package at his premises.
   4     Flash Loader           Infineon cugfoerins the chip as ordered. The user receives his PIN-letter and
         functional             fills his warehouse. As required the user:
         and PIN-Letter                applies the PIN-Letter on the chips taken from his warehouse, gets the
                                          chips user specific configured,
                                       activates the Flash Loader and
                                       the user flashes his software at his own premises.
                                If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also shares of the
                                user software during production. These user software shares must be delivered
                                to Infineon Technologies prior production. The user can finalize his software
                                package at his premises.
   5     Flash Loader           Infineon configures the chip as ordered. The user receives his PIN-letter and
         functional,            fills his warehouse. As required the user:
         active BPU and                applies the PIN-Letter on the chips taken from his warehouse, gets the
         PIN-Letter                       chips user specific configured,
                                       activates the Flash Loader,
                                       applies his user specific chip configuration with the BPU feature and
                                       flashes his software at his own premises.
                                If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also shares of the
                                user software during production. These user software shares must be delivered
                                to Infineon Technologies prior production. The user can finalize his software
                                package at his premises.

The listing provided in the confidential security target [8] contains the memory size ranges and other blocking
options, focusing on the maximum respectively minimum user available limitations. Within those limitations the
TOE configurations can vary under only one identical IC-hardware, regardless whether the configurations are set
by Infineon or within further limitations by the user. All configurations throughout all different mask sets the
TOE is made off and all thereof resulting derivatives have no impact on security and are covered by the
certificate.

CC Document                                            11                                                     1.8
                                                                                                       2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


Note that this TOE has no user available ROM. The user software and data are entirely located in a dedicated and
protected part of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. The long life storage endurance together with the means for error
detection and correction serves for excellent reliability and endurance.
In addition to the above listed flexible ranges, the user guidance contains a number of predefined configurations
for those customers not making use of the BPU option. All of these configurations belong to the TOE as well and
are of course made of the equal hardware and are inside the above declared ranges.
Today’s predefined configurations of the TOE are listed in the hardware reference manual HRM [1] and is
completed with the list of identification data of the derivatives. These predefined products come with the most
requested configurations and enables to produce volumes on stock in order to simplify logistic processes.
According to the BPU option, a non-limited number of configurations of the TOE may occur in the field. The
number of various configurations depends on the user and order contract only.
This TOE provides dedicated identification means and outputs the platform identifier, the design step and
further configuration information. The hardware reference manual HRM [1] is part of the user guidance and
enables for the clear interpretation of the read out identification data. More information is given in the
confidential Security Target [8].
These output data enable the user for clear identification of the TOE and also of one of the different mask sets
and therewith for examination of the validity of the certificate.
In addition, a dedicated RMS function allows reading out the present configuration in detail. The output RMS
data together with the hardware reference manual HRM [1] enables for clear identification of a product and its
configuration. All these steps for gathering identification and detailed configuration information can be done by
the user without involving the vendor, Infineon Technologies AG.

The TOE consists of the hardware part, the firmware parts in the alternative versions and the optional software
parts. The Smartcard Embedded Software, i.e. the operating system and applications are not part of the TOE.

The firmware comes with several alternative versions and consists of:
    the Boot Software (BOS) firmware conducting configuration and testing task (see chapter 2.2.2) at start-
        up of the TOE
    the Resource Management System (RMS) library providing essential basis functions for the management
        of the RAM, the branch table, the Memory Management Unit (MMU) and other resources
    the optional Flash Loader enabling for the download of user software to the SOLID FLASH™ NVM and
        required for the optional Bill per Use (BPU) feature and the PIN-letter feature
    the Radio Frequency Application Interface (RFAPI) supporting functions located in the ROM.
        The RFAPI functions are not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF)
    the NRG ROM part implementing some basic routines and used by the NRG if ordered.
        The NRG ROM part is not part of the TSF functionality.

The firmware parts BOS, RFAPI and NRG are implemented in a separated Test-ROM also being part of the TOE
but not available for the user. Completing firmware components are located in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.

The optional software parts are differentiated into following libraries:
    The asymmetric cryptographic libraries (ACL) in following alternative versions:
       v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003.
           o All ACL libraries provide RSA1 2048/4096 cryptography.
                The library supports also smaller key lengths, but the certification follows the national regulation
                by the BSI1.



1
    Rivest-Shamir-Adleman asymmetric cryptographic algorithm


CC Document                                                    12                                                1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


             o All ACL libraries provide elliptic curve cryptography EC2
        the Toolbox library in the versions v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003 provides basic mathematical
         functions for a simplified user interface to the Crypto@2304T. The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE
         Security Functionality (TSF).
        the symmetric cryptographic libraries (SCL) in the improved and enhanced version v2.04.002 and the
         version v2.02.010 provide simplified interfaces and utilize the full services of the SCP to the user
        the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 01.22.4346 and 02.01.6634 provides a simplified
         interface and utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user
        the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 03.11.8339 and 03.12.8812 provide equal to the above
         a simplified interface, utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user, and enables the
         use of an additional advanced reading respectively writing method
        the CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL and CCL) in the version v02.00.0004 provides the
         user OSPT alliance CIPURSE™ V2 conformant communication functionality between a PICC and a PCD
        the NRG Software. The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

The RSA, EC and Toolbox libraries provide certain functionality via an API to the Smartcard Embedded Software.
The private parts of the cryptographic libraries are only used internally and have no user interface. If neither the
RSA- nor the EC library is delivered, also the belonging private parts are not on board. The Toolbox library does
not have private library parts.
Each of the libraries ACL, SCL, HSL and NRG is independent from the other libraries and also independent of the
alternative library version of the equal type. This means for example that the HSL-1 runs alone and does not need
parts of HSL-2.
A combination respectively mix up of the two alternative libraries of equal type has not been considered in the
design and is not allowed: The user can select either one or the other of the same library type or none of it.
If the user considers the optional software libraries, the TOE can be delivered including – in free combinations –
or not including any of the optional libraries.

If the user decides not to use any of the offered asymmetric cryptographic libraries, regardless of the version
chosen, none of the cryptographic libraries is consequently delivered and the accompanying Additional Specific
Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions) Rivest-Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and/ or EC is/are not provided by the
TOE. Else it depends of the chosen library whether the Additional Specific Security Functionality
(O.Add-Functions) Rivest-Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and/ or EC is/are supported.

The Toolbox library, regardless of the version chosen, provides the user optionally basic arithmetic and modular
arithmetic operations, in order to support user software development using long integer operations. These basic
arithmetic operations do not provide security functionality, implement no security mechanism, and do not
proved additional specific security functionality – as defined for the cryptographic libraries.
The user developed software using the Toolbox basic operations is not part of the TOE.
The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

The symmetric cryptographic library SCL – in both versions – offers a high level interface to perform the
cryptographic operations DES, TDES and AES with different key lengths on the symmetric cryptographic
coprocessor (SCP) for this TOE. In addition, the SCL in version v2.04.002 implements computation of a CMAC
using AES and 3DES algorithms.

1
 BSI – Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik – Federal Office for Information Security: Following the national BSI
    recommendations, RSA key lengths below 1976 bits are not included in the certificate. Please note that the BSI expects this key length
    as appropriate until 2022 and recommends for longer usage times key lengths of 3000 bits or higher.
2 The Elliptic Curve Cryptography is abbreviated with EC only in the further, in order to avoid conflicts with the abbreviation for the Error
    Correction Code ECC.


CC Document                                                          13                                                                 1.8
                                                                                                                                 2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


The SCL implements already several block cipher modes as declared in this document and covering a wide range
of applications, the SCL offers in addition the flexibility to implement additional block cipher modes defined by
the user.
This library provides a simplified interface to the hardware Symmetric Cryptographic Coprocessor (SCP) and
preserves the security and performance requirements as required by the user.
Note that the definition of the key lengths follows the national AIS32 regulation regarding the 100 bit security
level by the BSI. This excludes the single DES operation from the certification.

Beside the inclusion and support of cryptographic libraries this TOE comes with the optional Hardware Support
Library (HSL) in different versions significantly simplifying the management of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM
functionality. The HSL constitutes an application interface (API) accessing the HSL state machine and
abstracting low level properties like special function registers and settings of specific hardware features. In short
the HSL provides a user friendly also use case oriented interface considering endurance, reliability and
performance requirements.
In certain configurations each of the HSL versions provide also functions implementing tearing safe behaviour of
the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. If applied the user has no need to care about cases where the TOE is unintentionally
removed from the power supply or the radio frequency field even during managing the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
Anyhow, the HSL – regardless of the version – remains as an optional library, as even sudden power off situations
do not lead to exploitable conditions of the TOE. In the worse, the TOE ends operation in case of a faulty
programmed SOLID FLASH™ NVM location.
In addition to the above, the HSL in version 03.12.8812 and 03.11.8339 provide an advanced additional method
called Incremental Write (IWR). This method provides enhanced endurance of the SOLID FLASH NVM even
beyond the erase endurance limits for often written objects. Thus this method serves applications with a demand
for high endurance and fast writing times. On the other hand, the read times using this method are slower than
the other methods provided.

The order option CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL) provides cryptographic functionality to
implement a CIPURSE™ V2 conformant protocol.
This protocol provides a secure mutual authentication of two entities, namely the terminal (denoted as PCD =
Proximity Coupling Device (CIPURSE™-compliant terminal)) and a smart card or a token in other form factors
which is called PICC. PICC stands for Proximity Integrated Circuit Card (CIPURSE™-compliant card).
Beside the mutual authentication, the protocol implements measures to maintain the integrity of the transferred
data and preserves in parallel the confidentiality of the transferred data.
By that the CIPURSE™ CL supports the user to implement systems conformant to the CIPURSE™ open standard
implementing a secured, interoperable and flexible transit fare collection solution, including ISO 7816, ISO/IEC
14443-4 communication and AES-128 bit cryptography for multiple payment types.

The NRG Software is a further order option and implements the routines for a NRG interface. The NRG provides
an operating system handling the emulation of a NRG card together with the RF interface. One part of the NRG
is permanently stored in the ROM and the second part consisting of patch and API is located in the SOLID
FLASH™ NVM. The second part is only present if the NRG is part of the delivery. If the NRG is not part of the
delivery the ROM part is present but not used. The NRG implements tearing safe behaviour in context with the
SOLID FLASH™ NVM management and is therefore independent from the HSL. The NRG is not part of the TOE
Security Functionality (TSF).

Deselecting one of the optional libraries does not include the code implementing functionality, which the user
decided not to use. Not including the code of the deselected functionality has no impact of any other security
policy of the TOE; it is exactly equivalent to the situation where the user decides just not to use the functionality.

All optional software libraries are stored respectively can be loaded into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
All other Smartcard Embedded Software loaded into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM does not belong to the TOE and
is not subject of the evaluation.
CC Document                                               14                                                       1.8
                                                                                                            2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


1.2            Target of Evaluation overview
The TOE comprises the Infineon Technologies Dual Interface Security Controller IFX_CCI_000003h with options
with specific IC dedicated software, optional cryptographic- and further services libraries.
The TOE is a member of the Infineon Technologies AG high security controller-family meeting the highest
requirements in terms of performance and security. A summary product description is given in this Security
TargePublic




   Common Criteria Public Security Target
   EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
   IFX_CCI_000003h
   IFX_CCI_000005h
   IFX_CCI_000008h
   IFX_CCI_00000Ch
   IFX_CCI_000013h
   IFX_CCI_000014h
   IFX_CCI_000015h
   IFX_CCI_00001Ch
   IFX_CCI_00001Dh
   IFX_CCI_000021h
   IFX_CCI_000022h

   H13

   Resistance to attackers with HIGH attack potential
                                    Including optional Software Libraries
                            Flash Loader – 3x ACL – 4x HSL – 2x SCL – NRG – CCL




 Author: Infineon Technologies
 Revision: 1.8




CC Document            Please read the Important Notice and Warnings at the end of this document          1.8
www.infineon.com                                                                                   2020-04-22
Public




Table of Contents
2.2.1         Hardware of the TOE ...................................................................................................................26
2.2.2         Firmware and software of the TOE .............................................................................................. 27
2.2.3         Interfaces of the TOE................................................................................................................... 32
2.2.4         Guidance documentation ............................................................................................................ 33
2.2.5         Forms of delivery ......................................................................................................................... 35
2.2.6         Production sites ........................................................................................................................... 37
3.1.1         Adding Objectives ....................................................................................................................... 39
3.1.2         AES and TDES .............................................................................................................................40
3.1.3         Loader .........................................................................................................................................40
3.1.4         CIPURSE Cryptographic Library (CCL) ......................................................................................... 41
3.1.5         Summary .....................................................................................................................................42
4.1.1         Additional Threat due to TOE specific Functionality .................................................................... 43
4.1.2         Assets regarding the Threats .......................................................................................................44
4.2.1         Augmented Organizational Security Policy .................................................................................46
4.3.1         Augmented Assumptions ............................................................................................................ 47
4.3.2         Note regarding CIPURSE™ CL .....................................................................................................48
5.3.1         Clarification of “Treatment of User Data (OE.Resp-Appl)” .......................................................... 54
5.3.2         Clarification of “Protection during Composite product Manufacturing (OE.Process-Sec-IC)” ...... 54
6.1.1         Definition of FPT_TST.2 ..............................................................................................................60
6.1.2         TSF self-test (FPT_TST) ............................................................................................................... 61
7.1.1         Extended Components FCS_RNG.1 and FAU_SAS.1 ................................................................... 65
7.1.2         Subset of TOE testing.................................................................................................................. 70
7.1.3         Memory access control ................................................................................................................ 71
7.1.4         Support of Cipher Schemes ......................................................................................................... 74
7.1.5         Data Integrity FDP_SDI.2 and FDP_SDC.1 ................................................................................. 103
7.1.6         Application Note to FPT_FLS.1 Failure with preservation of secure state .................................. 104
7.3.1         Refinements .............................................................................................................................. 109
7.4.1         Rationale for the Security Functional Requirements .................................................................. 113
7.4.2         Rationale of the Assurance Requirements ................................................................................. 124
8.1.1         Listing of SFRs implemented by SF_DPM Device Phase Management ...................................... 126
8.2.1         Listing of SFRs implemented by SF_PS Protection against Snooping........................................ 129
8.3.1         Listing of SFRs implemented by SF_PMA Protection against Modifying Attacks ...................... 131
8.4.1         Listing of SFRs implemented by SF_PLA Protection against Logical Attacks ............................ 132
8.5.1         Implementation of AES and TDES by the Symmetric Cryptographic Coprocessor SCP ............. 133
8.5.2         Implementation of TDES, AES and CMAC by the Symmetric Cryptographic Library SCL .......... 135
8.5.3         RSA Cryptographic Library for all versions................................................................................. 137
8.5.4         Elliptic Curves Cryptographic Library for all versions ................................................................. 139
8.5.5         Toolbox Library for all versions .................................................................................................. 140
8.5.6         CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library ............................................................................................. 141
8.5.7         Hybrid PTRNG ........................................................................................................................... 141
8.5.8         Listing of SFRs implemented by SF_CS “Cryptographic Support” ............................................. 142




CC Document                 Please read the Important Notice and Warnings at the end of this document                                                   1.8
www.infineon.com                                                                                                                                 2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)



1              Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

1.1            Security Target and Target of Evaluation Reference
The title of this document is Confidential Security Target as given on the front page and it covers and describes
one hardware platform respectively one IC representing the Target of Evaluation (TOE) with following Common
Criteria Identifiers:
     IFX_CCI_000003h
         IFX_CCI_000005h
         IFX_CCI_000008h
         IFX_CCI_00000Ch
         IFX_CCI_000013h
         IFX_CCI_000014h
         IFX_CCI_000015h
         IFX_CCI_00001Ch
         IFX_CCI_00001Dh
         IFX_CCI_000021h
      IFX_CCI_000022h
in the design step H13 and including optional software libraries and dedicated firmware in several versions as
stated and assigned in the table below.

In order to ease the readability of this document the bunch of Common Criteria Identifiers as listed above is
shortened and simply expressed with TOE (Target of Evaluation) or IFX_CCI_000003h with options.

This document is formed according to Common Criteria CCv3.1 EAL6 augmented (EAL6+) and comprises the
Infineon Technologies AG Security Controller (Integrated Circuit IC) with the above listed Common Criteria
Identifiers and with specific IC dedicated firmware and optional software.

The target of evaluation (TOE) is described in the following.
This Public Security Target has the revision 1.8 and is dated 2020-04-22.




CC Document                                              3                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


The Target of Evaluation (TOE) is the Infineon Security Controller with following optional available software
packages:
    The asymmetric cryptographic libraries (ACL) in following alternative versions:
       v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003.
            o All ACL libraries provide RSA1 2048/4096 cryptography.
                The library supports also smaller key lengths, but the certification follows the national regulation
                by the BSI2.
            o All ACL libraries provide elliptic curve cryptography EC3
    the Toolbox library in the versions v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003 provides basic mathematical
       functions for a simplified user interface to the Crypto@2304T. The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE
       Security Functionality (TSF).
    the symmetric cryptographic libraries (SCL) in the improved and enhanced version v2.04.002 and the
       version v2.02.010 provide simplified interfaces and utilize the full services of the SCP to the user
    the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 01.22.4346 and 02.01.6634 provides a simplified
       interface and utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user
    the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 03.11.8339 and 03.12.8812 provide equal to the above
       a simplified interface, utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user, and enables the
       use of an additional advanced reading respectively writing method
    the CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL and CCL) in the version v02.00.0004 provides the
       user OSPT alliance CIPURSE™ V2 conformant communication functionality between a PICC and a PCD
    the NRG Software. The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
and with further specific IC dedicated firmware in several alternative versions.

Please note that always the highest version number points to the most recent status of a library coming usually
with improvements and/or additional functionality.

Note that each of the versions of the ACL, SCL, HSL, CCL and the NRG are optional and alternatively. This means
that the TOE comes either with one of the alternative library types– depending on the user choice - or with none.
The library types can freely be combined but not two versions of the equal type. For examples ACL with SCL with
HSL with NRG is welcome but a combination of HSL in version 03.11.8339 and at the same time with HSL in
version 01.22.4346 would not work. The library types are entirely independent from each other.
The security relevant differences in the versions - if any - are detailed in chapter 8. The claims of this Security
Target take the corresponding versions into account and thus the wording in the following refers to the library
type which is cited or else the claim includes always all named versions.

The design step of this TOE is H13.

The Security Target is based on the Protection Profile PP-0084 Security IC Platform Protection Profile with
Augmentation Packages [9] as publicly available for download at https://www.bsi.bund.de and certified under
BSI-CC-PP-0084-2014.
The Security Target is built in compliance with Common Criteria v3.1 Revision 5.

The Security Target takes into account all relevant current final interpretations.

1
 Rivest-Shamir-Adleman asymmetric cryptographic algorithm
2
 BSI – Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik – Federal Office for Information Security: Following the national BSI
    recommendations, RSA key lengths below 1976 bits are not included in the certificate. Please note that the BSI expects this key length
    as appropriate until 2022 and recommends for longer usage times key lengths of 3000 bits or higher.
3 The Elliptic Curve Cryptography is abbreviated with EC only in the further, in order to avoid conflicts with the abbreviation for the Error
    Correction Code ECC.


CC Document                                                           4                                                                 1.8
                                                                                                                                 2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)



This TOE concept is based on the architecture, family concept and principles of the Integrity Guard implemented
in the controllers by Infineon Technologies AG deemed for high security requiring applications.

The certification body of this process is the German BSI, whereas the abbreviation stands for Federal Office for
Information Security, in German language Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik.




CC Document                                             5                                                      1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


                                          Table 1     Identification
                         Version           Date                            Registration
Security Target             1.8          2020-04-22                       This document
Target of Evaluation                                      The hardware controller with following identifiers:
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000003h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000005h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000008h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_00000Ch
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000013h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000014h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000015h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_00001Ch
                                                                          IFX_CCI_00001Dh
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000021h
                                                                          IFX_CCI_000022h
                                                      In the Design Step      H13
                                                           With following alternative FW-Identifiers
                                                                             v80.100.17.3
                                                                             v80.100.17.2
                                                                             v80.100.17.1
                                                                             v80.100.17.0
                                                      And following optional SW – libraries:
                                                      ACL-1 to -3 RSA2048 v2.08.007, v2.07.003, or
                                                      v2.06.003
                                                      ACL-1 to -3 RSA4096 v2.08.007, v2.07.003, or
                                                      v2.06.003
                                                      ACL-1 to -3 EC          v2.08.007, v2.07.003, or
                                                      v2.06.003
                                                      ACL-1 to 3 Toolbox      v2.08.007, v2.07.003, or
                                                      v2.06.003
                                                      HSL-1                   03.12.8812
                                                      HSL-2                   03.11.8339
                                                      HSL-3                   02.01.6634
                                                      HSL-4                   01.22.4346
                                                      SCL-1                   v2.04.002
                                                      SCL-2                   v2.02.010
                                                      NRG                     v02.04.3957
                                                      CIPURSE™ CL             v02.00.0004
                                                      Each of the above named libraries comes with a specific
                                                      user guidance document
                                                      Security IC Platform Protection Profile with
Protection Profile          1.0          2014-01-13
                                                      Augmentation Packages BSI-CC-PP-0084-2014



CC Document                                           6                                                     1.8
                                                                                                     2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


                             Version         Date                              Registration
                                                         Common Criteria for
                                                         Information Technology Security Evaluation
                                                         Part 1: Introduction and general model
                                3.1
                                                         CCMB-2017-04-001
Common Criteria                             2017-04
                                                         Part 2: Security functional requirements
                             Revision 5                  CCMB-2017-04-002
                                                         Part 3: Security Assurance Components
                                                         CCMB-2017-04-003
User Guidance Documentation Set
Chapter describes briefly the contents of the individual documents of the User Guidance Documentation,
while the individual documents are versioned and entitled in chapter 9 literature and references. The in this
chapter listed set of user guidance documents belongs to the TOE.

This TOE is represented by a number of various products which are all based on the equal design sources. The
TOE hardware remains entirely equal throughout all derivatives, but the usage for example in form of available
memory sizes, availability of the various interfaces, or other functions varies by means of blocking and chip
configuration. The firmware identifier on board depends on the order.
All TOE derivatives are derived from the equal hardware design results.

The TOE can be identified with the Generic Chip Identification Mode (GCIM). The IFX_CCI_000003h with options
hardware platform is identified by defined bytes of the GCIM as detailed in the HRM [1].
The unique hexadecimal values as stated in the title are:
                         IFX_CCI_000003h
                             IFX_CCI_000005h
                             IFX_CCI_000008h
                             IFX_CCI_00000Ch
                             IFX_CCI_000013h
                             IFX_CCI_000014h
                             IFX_CCI_000015h
                             IFX_CCI_00001Ch
                             IFX_CCI_00001Dh
                             IFX_CCI_000021h
                          IFX_CCI_000022h
The user can easily identify from which production line a certain IC is coming. The corresponding identifier is
given in chapter 2.2.6

These bytes clearly identify the hardware platform, or, in other words, the therein possible values for
IFX_CCI_000003h with options (without prefix IFX_CCI_) represent the equal hardware platform of this TOE. This
means that the hardware entirely equals throughout all derivatives and that the differences are achieved by
configuration and blocking means only. These values are unique for this hardware platform. This means that
these values will not be used in any other platform or product.
The interpretation of the output GCIM data is clearly explained in the user guidance, Hardware Reference Manual
HRM [1].
Although the TOE is represented by a number of various products, all based on the equal design sources, the
hardware is constituted out of few slightly different mask sets enabling to adapt to various external contactless
and contact based devices not being part of this TOE. Except this external adapt capability the TOE hardware
CC Document                                              7                                                       1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


and firmware – depending on the order option – remains entirely equal throughout all derivatives, but the usage
for example in form of available memory sizes, availability of the various interfaces, or other functions varies by
means of blocking and chip configuration. This blocking is applied by Infineon settings during the production
only. Again, all TOE derivatives are derived from the equal hardware design results, the IFX_CCI_000003h with
options.
The differences between the derivatives are achieved by blocking only and have no impact on the TOEs security
policies and related functions. Details are explained in the user guidance hardware reference manual HRM [1].
All product derivatives are identically from module design, layout and footprint, but are made different in their
possibilities to connect to different types of external antennas or to a contact based interface only. Therefore,
the TOE is represented and made out of different mask sets with following TOE internal and security irrelevant
differences:
The differences between the mask sets implement different input capacitances in the analogue part of the radio
frequency interface (RFI). This differentiation in the input capacitances enable for the connection of a wider
range of various antenna types. Note that external antennas or interfaces are not part of the TOE.
To each of the mask sets, an individual value is assigned, which is part of the data output of the Generic Chip
Identification Mode (GCIM). This number is located in the GCIM part individual length byte to clearly
differentiate between the mask sets related to the different input capacitances. Details are explained in the user
guidance hardware reference manual (HRM) and in the errata sheet.
There are no other differences between the mask sets the TOE is produced with.
The IFX_CCI_000003h with options products enable for a maximum of configuration possibilities defined by the
customer order following the market needs. For example, a TOE product can come in one project with the fully
available SOLID FLASH™ NVM1 or in another project with any other SOLID FLASH™ NVM –size below the
physical implementation size, or with a different RAM size. And more, the user has the free choice, whether he
needs the symmetric co-processor SCP, or the asymmetric co-processor Crypto2304T, or both, or none of them.
In addition, the user decides, whether the TOE comes with a free combination of software libraries or without
any. And, to be even more flexible, various interface options can be chosen as well.

To sum up the major selections, the user defines by his order:
      the firmware identifier in several alternatives
      the available memory sizes of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM and RAM
      the availability of the cryptographic coprocessors SCP and Crypto@2304T
      the availability and free combinations of the cryptographic libraries
         ACL-1, ACL-2, ACL-3, SCL-1 and SCL-2
      the availability of the CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library
      the availability of the Flash Loader
      the availability of the alternative libraries HSL-1 or HSL-2 or HSL-3 or HSL-4
      the availability of the library NRG
      the availability of various interface options
      the possibility to tailor the product by blocking on his own premises (BPU)
      the possibility to apply the PIN letter in combination with the Flash Loader
The degree of freedom of the chip configuration is predefined by Infineon Technologies AG and made available
via the order tool.

Beside fix TOE configurations, which can be ordered as usual, this TOE implements optionally the so called
Billing-Per-Use (BPU) ability. This solution enables our customer to tailor the product on his own to the required


   1
       SOLID FLASH™ is an Infineon Trade Mark and stands for the Infineon Flash NVM. The abbreviation NVM is short for Non Volatile
                                Memory. The information remains stored even the power has been removed.


CC Document                                                        8                                                              1.8
                                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


configuration – project by project. By that BPU allows for significant reduction of logistic cost at all participating
parties and serves for acceleration of delivery of tailored product to the end-user.
BPU enables our customers to block the chip on demand into the final configuration at his own premises, without
further delivery or involving support by Infineon Technology.
The realization of it requires the presence of the Flash Loader software, enhanced with the BPU blocking
software part. The presence of the BPU ability defines the customer with his order.
The user then receives this TOE in a predefined starting configuration, for example entirely unblocked. Again,
the delivered starting configuration depends on the user order. After delivery, the user can put the TOE in
volume on his stock and can block it down to the required sizes and features, whenever a certain configuration is
required by a certain project.
Depending on the number of TOE products delivered, and their individual final blocked configuration, the
customer receives a balancing payment. By that our customers are charged only for the true configurations
required in their projects.
As written above, the software realizing the user allowed blocking, is implemented and delivered in the TOE –
depending on the order - and is part of the evaluation and certificate. This software is an additional part of the
Flash Loader software but also the other firmware – in all alternative versions - has seen a small enhancement to
enable for BPU.
If BPU is available, the blocking is done by the user at user premises, usually by taking an enhancement of the
user own personalization flow and applying the according APDUs. These APDUs are predefined by Infineon
Technologies and can also depend on the customer order. Only these APDUs can block the chip according to the
user demands.
Infineon Technologies AG provides special software, running in parallel when doing the blocking. This software
summarizes all devices and final configurations allowing for the later commercial balancing. The balancing
depends on the number of chips and their individual final blockings the user has made over a defined time span.
This special software can be used only for the commercial balancing, is not present on the TOE, not security
relevant and therefore not part of this certificate.
All blockings are done by setting the according value in the chip configuration page, where certain parts are left
available to the blocking software. Strong means of authentication are in place. The blocking software
respectively BPU software is an additional part of the Flash Loader software and the only piece of software, able
to manage the blocking APDUs. Therefore, the presence of the Flash Loader software is essential for the BPU
ability.
The user can only apply a predefined and checksum protected set of allowed APDU configuration commands
provided by Infineon Technologies AG. For this, the Flash Loader BPU software part, together with the firmware
– regardless of the version used -, executes one of those APDUs. After the final blocking is done and the user
additionally may have downloaded his software, the entire Flash Loader including the BPU software part is
permanently deactivated. This is called locking of the Flash Loader.
Of course, exclusively all security relevant settings are contained in the IFX-only part. The Flash Loader BPU
software does not access and has no access to the IFX-only part.
Once the user blocking by applying the APDU has been finalized, the configuration page is no more accessible
for changes. After the locking of the Flash Loader, the product is permanently fixed regarding its configurations
and software. A reactivation of the Flash Loader is not possible. At the next start-up, the Boot-Up-Software
(BOS) applies the made settings, and, if called, a Resource Management System (RMS)-function can output the
finally made chip configuration for verification and information purposes.
The entire configuration storage area is protected against manipulation, perturbation and false access. Note that
the IFX-only part of the configuration page is already access protected prior delivery to the user and the TOE
leaves the Infineon Technology premises only locked into User Mode.
The BPU software part is only active on the products which have been ordered with the BPU option. In all other
cases this software is disabled on the product. If a product is ordered without Flash Loader, also the Flash Loader
software is disabled and the BPU configuration changes are blocked in the IFX-configuration, which renders BPU
functionality unusable. Therefore, the BPU feature is only possible if the Flash Loader is active.


CC Document                                               9                                                        1.8
                                                                                                            2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


If the user decides to use the Flash Loader, regardless whether it is ordered with or without BPU, an additional
process option can be ordered which results in an additional status of the Flash Loader. This process is called PIN-
Letter and enables for simplified logistics and thereby for faster delivery of the ordered TOE products to the user.
The PIN-Letter feature enabling for the PIN-Letter process is an implemented part of the Flash Loader. The
resulting logistical acceleration is possible since the PIN-Letter enables for delivery of not user-specific
configured, not flashed and not personalized TOE products to the user warehouse.
Extra authentication means applied in the PIN-Letter status of the Flash Loader preserve that only the intended
user with the intended PIN-Letter can configure with user specific information and enable the normal Flash
Loader functions in a second step. By that the user orders the products and receives - in a protected way - the
belonging PIN-Letter. PIN-Letter and delivered chips must match.
By delivery the user warehouse gets filled and depending on market demands the user can immediate apply the
authentication means of the PIN-letter. If passing, the TOE products become user specific configured and the
Flash Loader can be used for this specific user in a second step.
The following table outlines the different ways how the user can input his software on this TOE – a TOE without
user available ROM. User software comprises usually the operating system and applications, which are for
Infineon Technologies simply a user data package which is handled as a fixed data package during production.
This provides high process flexibility for the user of which an overview is given in the following table:


                         Table 2        Options to implement user software on the chip
 Case                          Option                                          Flash Loader Status
         The user or/and a subcontractor downloads the
         software into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM on his             The Flash Loader can be activated or reactivated
 1.      own. Infineon Technologies has not received user      by the user or subcontractor to download his
         software and there are no user data of the            software in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
         Composite TOE in the ROM.
         The user provides his complete software for the
         download into the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to
                                                               The Flash Loader is permanently disabled prior
 2       Infineon Technologies AG. The software is
                                                               delivery.
         downloaded to the SOLID FLASH™ NVM during
         chip production.
                                                               When leaving the Infineon Technologies
                                                               production facility, the Flash Loader is blocked,
         The user provides software for the download into      but can be activated or reactivated by the user or
         the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to Infineon                      subcontractor to complete the previously stored
 3       Technologies AG. The software is downloaded to        software parts in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
         the SOLID FLASH™ NVM during chip
         production.                                           Precondition is that the user has provided an own
                                                               reactivation procedure in software prior chip
                                                               production to Infineon Technologies AG.

For the cases with active Flash Loader on board and whenever the user has finalized his SW-download,
respectively the TOE is in the final state and about to be delivered to the end-user, the user is obligated to lock
the Flash Loader. This locking is the final step and results in a permanent deactivation of the Flash Loader. This
means that once being in the locked status, the Flash Loader cannot be reactivated anymore.
Note that whenever a TOE comes without active Flash Loader, BPU and PIN-Letter process are not possible.
All in all various delivery combinations are given and for example, a product can come with a fix configuration
and with Flash Loader, to enable the user to download software, but without BPU option and with PIN-Letter.
The following cases can occur:

                         Table 3        Options with Flash Loader, BPU and PIN-Letter
CC Document                                              10                                                       1.8
                                                                                                           2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


 Case           Order                                              Option
   1     Fix configuration,            Infineon Technologies configures and flashes all software as ordered.
         Flash Loader is               The entire user software must be delivered to Infineon Technologies
         locked (permanent)             prior production.
   2     Flash Loader                  Infineon configures the chip as ordered and
         functional, BPU               the user flashes his software at his own premises.
         feature blocked               If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also
                                        shares of the user software during production. These user software
                                        shares must be delivered to Infineon Technologies prior production.
                                        The user can finalize his software package at his premises.
   3     Flash Loader           The user:
         functional                 Activates the Flash Loader,
         and active BPU             configures the chip applying the BPU feature and
         feature
                                    flashes his software at his own premises.
                                    If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also
                                       shares of the user software during production. These user software
                                       shares must be delivered to Infineon Technologies prior production.
                                       The user can finalize his software package at his premises.
   4     Flash Loader           Infineon configures the chip as ordered. The user receives his PIN-letter and
         functional             fills his warehouse. As required the user:
         and PIN-Letter                applies the PIN-Letter on the chips taken from his warehouse, gets the
                                          chips user specific configured,
                                       activates the Flash Loader and
                                       the user flashes his software at his own premises.
                                If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also shares of the
                                user software during production. These user software shares must be delivered
                                to Infineon Technologies prior production. The user can finalize his software
                                package at his premises.
   5     Flash Loader           Infineon configures the chip as ordered. The user receives his PIN-letter and
         functional,            fills his warehouse. As required the user:
         active BPU and                applies the PIN-Letter on the chips taken from his warehouse, gets the
         PIN-Letter                       chips user specific configured,
                                       activates the Flash Loader,
                                       applies his user specific chip configuration with the BPU feature and
                                       flashes his software at his own premises.
                                If requested, Infineon Technologies can optionally download also shares of the
                                user software during production. These user software shares must be delivered
                                to Infineon Technologies prior production. The user can finalize his software
                                package at his premises.

The listing provided in the confidential security target [8] contains the memory size ranges and other blocking
options, focusing on the maximum respectively minimum user available limitations. Within those limitations the
TOE configurations can vary under only one identical IC-hardware, regardless whether the configurations are set
by Infineon or within further limitations by the user. All configurations throughout all different mask sets the
TOE is made off and all thereof resulting derivatives have no impact on security and are covered by the
certificate.

CC Document                                            11                                                     1.8
                                                                                                       2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


Note that this TOE has no user available ROM. The user software and data are entirely located in a dedicated and
protected part of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. The long life storage endurance together with the means for error
detection and correction serves for excellent reliability and endurance.
In addition to the above listed flexible ranges, the user guidance contains a number of predefined configurations
for those customers not making use of the BPU option. All of these configurations belong to the TOE as well and
are of course made of the equal hardware and are inside the above declared ranges.
Today’s predefined configurations of the TOE are listed in the hardware reference manual HRM [1] and is
completed with the list of identification data of the derivatives. These predefined products come with the most
requested configurations and enables to produce volumes on stock in order to simplify logistic processes.
According to the BPU option, a non-limited number of configurations of the TOE may occur in the field. The
number of various configurations depends on the user and order contract only.
This TOE provides dedicated identification means and outputs the platform identifier, the design step and
further configuration information. The hardware reference manual HRM [1] is part of the user guidance and
enables for the clear interpretation of the read out identification data. More information is given in the
confidential Security Target [8].
These output data enable the user for clear identification of the TOE and also of one of the different mask sets
and therewith for examination of the validity of the certificate.
In addition, a dedicated RMS function allows reading out the present configuration in detail. The output RMS
data together with the hardware reference manual HRM [1] enables for clear identification of a product and its
configuration. All these steps for gathering identification and detailed configuration information can be done by
the user without involving the vendor, Infineon Technologies AG.

The TOE consists of the hardware part, the firmware parts in the alternative versions and the optional software
parts. The Smartcard Embedded Software, i.e. the operating system and applications are not part of the TOE.

The firmware comes with several alternative versions and consists of:
    the Boot Software (BOS) firmware conducting configuration and testing task (see chapter 2.2.2) at start-
        up of the TOE
    the Resource Management System (RMS) library providing essential basis functions for the management
        of the RAM, the branch table, the Memory Management Unit (MMU) and other resources
    the optional Flash Loader enabling for the download of user software to the SOLID FLASH™ NVM and
        required for the optional Bill per Use (BPU) feature and the PIN-letter feature
    the Radio Frequency Application Interface (RFAPI) supporting functions located in the ROM.
        The RFAPI functions are not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF)
    the NRG ROM part implementing some basic routines and used by the NRG if ordered.
        The NRG ROM part is not part of the TSF functionality.

The firmware parts BOS, RFAPI and NRG are implemented in a separated Test-ROM also being part of the TOE
but not available for the user. Completing firmware components are located in the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.

The optional software parts are differentiated into following libraries:
    The asymmetric cryptographic libraries (ACL) in following alternative versions:
       v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003.
           o All ACL libraries provide RSA1 2048/4096 cryptography.
                The library supports also smaller key lengths, but the certification follows the national regulation
                by the BSI1.



1
    Rivest-Shamir-Adleman asymmetric cryptographic algorithm


CC Document                                                    12                                                1.8
                                                                                                          2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


             o All ACL libraries provide elliptic curve cryptography EC2
        the Toolbox library in the versions v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003 provides basic mathematical
         functions for a simplified user interface to the Crypto@2304T. The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE
         Security Functionality (TSF).
        the symmetric cryptographic libraries (SCL) in the improved and enhanced version v2.04.002 and the
         version v2.02.010 provide simplified interfaces and utilize the full services of the SCP to the user
        the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 01.22.4346 and 02.01.6634 provides a simplified
         interface and utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user
        the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 03.11.8339 and 03.12.8812 provide equal to the above
         a simplified interface, utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user, and enables the
         use of an additional advanced reading respectively writing method
        the CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL and CCL) in the version v02.00.0004 provides the
         user OSPT alliance CIPURSE™ V2 conformant communication functionality between a PICC and a PCD
        the NRG Software. The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

The RSA, EC and Toolbox libraries provide certain functionality via an API to the Smartcard Embedded Software.
The private parts of the cryptographic libraries are only used internally and have no user interface. If neither the
RSA- nor the EC library is delivered, also the belonging private parts are not on board. The Toolbox library does
not have private library parts.
Each of the libraries ACL, SCL, HSL and NRG is independent from the other libraries and also independent of the
alternative library version of the equal type. This means for example that the HSL-1 runs alone and does not need
parts of HSL-2.
A combination respectively mix up of the two alternative libraries of equal type has not been considered in the
design and is not allowed: The user can select either one or the other of the same library type or none of it.
If the user considers the optional software libraries, the TOE can be delivered including – in free combinations –
or not including any of the optional libraries.

If the user decides not.
This TOE is intended to be used in any application and device requiring the highest level of security, for example
as secure element in various devices with various form factors.
This member of the high security controller family features a security philosophy focusing on data integrity
instead of numerous sensors. By that two main principles combined in close synergy are utilized in the security
concept called the Integrity Guard. These main principles are the comprehensive error detection, including the
double CPU, and the full encrypted data path, leaving no plain data on the chip. These principles proved that
they provide excellent protection against invasive and non-invasive attacks known today.
The intelligent shielding algorithm finishes the upper layers, finally providing the so called intelligent implicit
active shielding I2-shield. This provides physical protection against probing and forcing.
This TOE provides multiple contact based and contactless interface options for various applications and markets.
Due to the interface flexibility the product can be used in almost any application, within any device and almost
any form factor. Due to these multiple communication possibilities, the TOE can be seen as a stand-alone
security device being capable to maintain the various communication interfaces simultaneously. Therefore this
TOE is able to run multiple applications, using multiple interfaces independently at the same time.
Again these multiple communication and application independency capabilities enable the usage to almost
everywhere, where highly secure applications are in use and of course in any other application as well. This TOE
is deemed for governmental, corporate, transport and payment markets, or wherever a secure root of trust is
required. Various types of applications can use this TOE, for example in closed loop logical access controls,
physical access controls, secure internet access control and internet authentication, or as multi-application token
or simply as encrypted storage.
This dual interface controller is able to communicate using either the contact based or the contactless interface.
The implemented dual interface provides a maximum flexibility in using following communication protocols
respectively methods:

Contactless Interfaces Options:
    ISO 14443 Type A and Type B
       These are ISO defined proximity contactless protocols using an external antenna and the TOE
       implemented analogue and digital radio frequency interface.
    Advance Framing Mode (AFM)
       This feature implements a frame format with means of error detection and correction applicable for ISO
       14443 Type A and Type B according to the standard ISO/IEC 14443-4AMX
    ISO/IEC 18092
       This is an ISO defined proximity contactless protocol using an external antenna and the TOE
       implemented analogue and digital radio frequency interface.
    NRG Interface
       This is implemented by the options NRG providing a proprietary proximity contactless protocol using an
       external antenna and the TOE implemented analogue and digital radio frequency interface, as well as
       the memory part reserved for NRG use. This interface comprises also the ability to implement the
       Advanced Mode for NRG SAM communication.
    And further advanced high-speed communication modes. More information is given in the confidential
       Security Target [8].

Contact based Interface Options:

CC Document                                             15                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


      ISO 7816
       This is the ISO defined standard contact based communication protocol, using the UART and the pads.
      Analogue Contactless Bridge mode (ACLB)
       The ACLB mode provides the possibility to leave the analogue communication to the external device.
       More information is given in the confidential Secut to use any of the offered asymmetric cryptographic libraries, regardless of the version
chosen, none of the cryptographic libraries is consequently delivered and the accompanying Additional Specific
Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions) Rivest-Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and/ or EC is/are not provided by the
TOE. Erity Target [8].
      Inter Integrated Circuit Interface (I2C)
       The Inter-Integrated Circuit (IIC) module is able to be connected to an external multi-master-serial-bus-
       system. The IIC protocol software is not part of the TOE. More information is given in the confidential
       Security Target [8].
      General Purpose Input/Output (GPIO)
       The GPIO module supports a number of general purpose I/O signals in parallel and independent of each
       other. Each of the I/O signals can be configured. More information is given in the confidential Security
       Target [8].

Further interface operational modes in contact based and contactless communication are available and outlined
in the confidential Security Target [8].

The TOE provides a real 16-bit CPU-architecture and is compatible to the MCS®251 instruction set with an
execution time faster than a standard MCS®251 microcontroller at the same clock frequency. The major
components of the core system are the two CPUs (Central Processing Units), acting as one, the MMU (Memory
Management Unit) and the MED (Memory Encryption/Decryption Unit). The Core implements also the Post
Failure Detection (PFD) covering CPU, Cache and MED. The two CPUs control each other in order to detect faults
and serve by this for data integrity. The TOE implements a full 16 MByte linear addressable memory space for
each privilege level, a simple scalable Memory Management concept and a scalable stack size. The flexible
memory concept consists of a ROM, RAM and the non-volatile memory (NVM), which we call SOLID FLASH™
NVM. The ROM is not available for the user.
The ROM is not available for the user and contains the main parts of firmware components only.

The firmware comes in several alternative versions and is composed out of the:
    Boot-up software (BOS), the Resource Management System (RMS), the Flash Loader (FL), the NRG code
        part located in the ROM and the RFI supporting functions. The BOS applies the essential configuration,
        internal testing and the start-up.
        The NRG ROM part and the RFI supporting functions are not part of the TOE Security Functionality
        (TSF).
    The RMS implements a low level application interface (API) to the Smartcard Embedded Software and
        provides handling and managing routines for RAM, MMU, Branch table, configuration and further
        functions.
    The Flash Loader allows downloading user software to the SOLID FLASH™ NVM during the
        manufacturing process and also at user premises – if ordered.
    The Radio Frequency Interface Application Interface (RFAPI) functions consist of executable code in the
        ROM which is part of the TOE and a SOLID FLASH™ NVM code part which is delivered separately to the
        user and which is not part of the TOE. The RFAPI is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).
    The NRG software part located in the ROM. These routines are only called if the NRG library is executed;
        else these routines are not used. The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

With regard to the RFAPI part, this means that the TOE products are delivered without the code part located in
the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. This RFAPI part is a piece of software delivered separated from the chip in order to be
implemented by the user together with his software. Only the RFAPI SOLID FLASH™ NVM code part can call the
RFAPI ROM functions and optimize the contactless communication. Therefore, the RFAPI ROM functions do not
implement a user interface. In general the RFAPI implements a fast TOE startup and simplifies the user settings
CC Document                                            16                                                      1.8
                                                                                                        2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


for optimized contactless communication. The ROM and SOLID FLASH™ NVM areas storing the RFAPI functions
are access protected and only the SOLID FLASH™ NVM part, which is not part of the TOE, implements the user
interface. The RFAPI is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

This TOE implements a Hybrid Random Number Generator (HRNG). This HRNG equals to the expression Hybrid
Physical True Random Number Generator (hybrid PTRNG) as defined by the BSI. In the following, the BSI
expression hybrid PTRNG is used. The hybrid PTRNG implements a true physical random source and has
evidenced its conformance to the classes of AIS31 [13] as declared in chapter 7.1.1.1.
The produced genuine random numbers are available as a security service for the user and are also used for
internal purposes. Together with the guidelines in [6] the hybrid PTRNG operates in the following modes of
operation and is conformant to the named classes:
     True Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.2
     Hybrid Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.3
     Deterministic Random Number Generation (DRNG) AIS31 DRG.3
     Key Stream Generation (KSG), stream cipher generation AIS31 DRG.2
The hybrid PTRNG is deemed for any application requiring excellent physical random data entropy.

The two cryptographic coprocessors serve the need of modern cryptography:
    The symmetric co-processor (SCP) combines both AES and DES with one, two or triple-key hardware
       acceleration. Please note that the single DES algorithm is not in the scope of evaluation due to national
       regulation by BSI.
    And, the Asymmetric Crypto Co-processor, called Crypto@2304T, provides optimized high performance
       calculations for the user software executing cryptographic operations and is also used by the optional
       cryptographic libraries for Rivest-Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and Elliptic Curve (EC) cryptography.

The optional software parts are differentiated into following libraries:
    The asymmetric cryptographic libraries (ACL) in following alternative versions:
       v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003.
           o All ACL libraries provide RSA1 2048/4096 cryptography.
                The library supports also smaller key lengths, but the certification follows the national regulation
                by the BSI2.
           o All ACL libraries provide elliptic curve cryptography EC3
    the Toolbox library in the versions v2.08.007, v2.07.003 and v2.06.003 provides basic mathematical
       functions for a simplified user interface to the Crypto@2304T. The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE
       Security Functionality (TSF).
    the symmetric cryptographic libraries (SCL) in the improved and enhanced version v2.04.002 and the
       version v2.02.010 provide simplified interfaces and utilize the full services of the SCP to the user
    the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 01.22.4346 and 02.01.6634 provides a simplified
       interface and utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user
    the hardware support library (HSL) in the versions 03.11.8339 and 03.12.8812 provide equal to the above
       a simplified interface, utilizes the full services of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM to the user, and enables the
       use of an additional advanced reading respectively writing method

1
 Rivest-Shamir-Adleman asymmetric cryptographic algorithm
2
 BSI – Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik – Federal Office for Information Security: Following the national BSI
    recommendations, RSA key lengths below 1976 bits are not included in the certificate. Please note that the BSI expects this key length
    as appropriate until 2022 and recommends for longer usage times key lengths of 3000 bits or higher.
3 The Elliptic Curve Cryptography is abbreviated with EC only in the further, in order to avoid conflicts with the abbreviation for the Error
    Correction Code ECC.


CC Document                                                          17                                                                 1.8
                                                                                                                                 2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


       the CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL and CCL) in the version v02.00.0004 provides the
        user OSPT alliance CIPURSE™ V2 conformant communication functionality between a PICC and a PCD
       the NRG Software. The NRG is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

The RSA cryptographic library, regardless of the version chosen:
     provides a high level interface to the hardware component Crypto2304T and includes countermeasures
        against fault injection and side channel attacks.
     implements the generation of RSA Key Pairs (RsaKeyGen), the RSA signature verification (RsaVerify),
        the RSA signature generation (RsaSign) and the RSA modulus recalculation (RsaModulus). This RSA
        library can perform RSA operations from 512 to 4096 bits.
     implements the high level interface to hardware cryptographic coprocessor Crypto2304T which runs the
        basic long number calculations (add, subtract, multiply, square) with high performance.
The RSA library is delivered as object code and in this way integrated in the user software.
Following the national BSI recommendations, RSA key lengths below 1976 bits are not included in the certificate.
Please note that the BSI expects this key length as appropriate until 2022 and recommends for longer usage
times key lengths of 3000 bits or higher.

The EC library, regardless of the version chosen:
     provides a high level interface to Elliptic Curve Cryptography computed on the hardware component
        Crypto2304T and includes countermeasures against fault injection and side channel attacks.
     implements routines for ECDSA signature generation, for ECDSA signature verification, ECDSA key
        generation and for the Elliptic Curve Diffie-Hellman key agreement.
     In addition, the EC library provides an additional function for calculating primitive elliptic curve
        operations like ECC Add and ECC Double.
     EC curves over prime field Fp, as well as over GF(2n) finite field are supported too.
The EC library is delivered as object code and in this way integrated in the user software.
The security functional requirement covers the standard Brainpool [19] and NIST [26] Elliptic Curves with key
lengths of 160, 163, 192, 224, 233, 256, 283, 320, 384, 409, 512 or 521 bits.
The definition of the key lengths follows the national AIS32 regulation regarding the 100 bit security level by the
BSI.
Numerous other curve types, being also secure in terms of side channel attacks on this TOE, exist, which the user
optionally can add in the composition certification process.

If the user decides not to use any of the offered cryptographic library(s), regardless of the version, none of the
cryptographic libraries is consequently delivered and the accompanying Additional Specific Security
Functionality (O.Add-Functions) Rivest-Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and/ or EC is/are not provided by the TOE. Else it
depends of the chosen library whether the Additional Specific Security Functionality (O.Add-Functions) Rivest-
Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and/ or EC is/are supported.

The Toolbox library, regardless of the version chosen, does not provide cryptographic support or additional
security functionality as it provides only the following basic long integer arithmetic and modular functions in
software, supported by the cryptographic coprocessor: Addition, subtraction, division, multiplication,
comparison, reduction, modular addition, modular subtraction, modular multiplication, modular inversion and
modular exponentiation. No security relevant policy, mechanism or function is supported. The Toolbox library is
deemed for software developers as support for simplified implementation of long integer and modular
arithmetic operations. The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

The symmetric cryptographic library SCL offers a high level interface to perform the cryptographic operations
DES, TDES and AES with different key lengths on the symmetric cryptographic coprocessor (SCP) for this TOE.

CC Document                                             18                                                      1.8
                                                                                                         2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


In addition, the SCL implements MAC computation of a CMAC, using AES and 3DES algorithms, respectively a
RetailMAC using the DES algorithm.
The SCL implements already several block cipher modes as declared in this document and covers a wide range of
applications, but the SCL offers in addition the flexibility to implement additional user defined block cipher
modes.
Both library versions provide a simplified interface to the hardware Symmetric Cryptographic Coprocessor (SCP)
and preserve the security and performance requirements as required by the user.
Even in the basic configuration the SCL meets the tarlse it depends of the chosen library whether the Additional Specific Security Functionality
(O.Add-Functions) Rivest-Shamir-Adleman (RSA) and/ or EC is/are supported.

The Toolbox library, regardless of the version chosen, provides the user optionally basic arithmetic and modular
arithmetic operations, in order to support user software development using long integer operations. These basic
arithmetic operations do not provide security functionality, implement no security mechanism, and do not
proved additional specific security functionality – as defined for the cryptographic libraries.
The user developed software using the Toolbox basic operations is not part of the TOE.
The Toolbox library is not part of the TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

The symmetric cryptographic library SCL – in both versions – offers a high level interface to perform the
cryptographic operations DES, TDES and AES with different key lengths on the symmetric cryptographic
coprocessor (SCP) for this TOE. In addition, the SCL in version v2.04.002 implements computation of a CMAC
using AES and 3DES algorithms.

1
 BSI – Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik – Federal Office for Information Security: Following the national BSI
    recommendations, RSA key lengths below 1976 bits are not included in the certificate. Please note that the BSI expects this key length
    as appropriate until 2022 and recommends for longer usage times key lengths of 3000 bits or higher.
2 The Elliptic Curve Cryptography is abbreviated with EC only in the further, in order to avoid conflicts with the abbreviation for the Error
    Correction Code ECC.


CC Document                                                          13                                                                 1.8
                                                                                                                                 2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


The SCL implements already several bgeted security level, which can be further increased by
simple means of configuration options.
The key lengths used for the AES and DES functionality follow the national AIS32 regulation regarding the 100
bit security level issued by the BSI1. This regulation excludes the single DES operation from the certification as it
is considered to be not sufficiently secure from algorithm perspective.
For both versions, the certification covers the SCL cryptographic functionality of the AES algorithm with key
lengths of 128, 192, 256 bits and the TDEA or TripleDES (TDES) algorithm with an effective key size of 112 and
168 bits. For the version v2.04.002 the certification covers the CMAC functionality too.

Note that this TOE can come with both cryptographic co-processors accessible, or with a blocked SCP or with a
blocked Crypto2304T, or with both cryptographic co-processors blocked. The blocking depends on the user’s
choice. No accessibility of the deselected cryptographic co-processors is without impact on any other security
policy of the TOE; it is exactly equivalent to the situation where the user decides just not to use the cryptographic
co-processors.

Beside the inclusion and support of cryptographic libraries this TOE comes with the optional Hardware Support
Library (HSL) in different alternative versions, significantly simplifying the management of the SOLID FLASH™
NVM functionality. The HSL constitutes an application interface (API) accessing the HSL state machine and
abstracting low level properties like special function registers and settings of specific hardware features. In short
the HSL provides a user friendly also use case oriented interface considering endurance, reliability and
performance. In certain configurations the HSL provides also functions implementing tearing safe behaviour of
the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. If used the user has no need to care about cases where the TOE is suddenly cut off the
power supply even during managing the SOLID FLASH™ NVM.
Anyhow, the HSL remains as an optional library as even sudden power off situations does never lead to
exploitable conditions of the TOE. In the worse the TOE ends operation in case of a faulty programmed SOLID
FLASH™ NVM location due to the Integrity Guard.
In addition to the above, the HSL in version 03.12.8812 and 03.11.8339 provide an advanced additional method
called Incremental Write (IWR). This method provides enhanced endurance of the SOLID FLASH NVM even
beyond the erase endurance limits for often written objects. Thus this method serves applications with a demand
for high endurance and fast writing times. On the other hand, the read times using this method are slower than
the other methods provided.

The order option CIPURSE™ Cryptographic Library (CIPURSE™ CL) provides cryptographic functionality to
implement a CIPURSE™ V2 conformant protocol.
This protocol provides a secure mutual authentication of two entities, namely the terminal (denoted as PCD =
Proximity Coupling Device (CIPURSE™-compliant terminal)) and a smart card or a token in other form factors
which is called PICC. PICC stands for Proximity Integrated Circuit Card (CIPURSE™-compliant card).
Beside the mutual authentication, the protocol implements measures to maintain the integrity of the transferred
data and preserves in parallel the confidentiality of the transferred data.
By that the CIPURSE™ CL supports the user to implement systems conformant to the CIPURSE™ open standard
implementing a secured, interoperable and flexible transit fare collection solution, including ISO 7816, ISO/IEC
14443-4 communication and AES-128 bit cryptography for multiple payment types.

           1
               German: Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik, English: Federal Office for Information Security


CC Document                                                        19                                                                 1.8
                                                                                                                               2020-04-22
Public Security Target
Common Criteria v3.1 - EAL6 augmented / EAL6+
Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


By that the CIPURSE™ CL supports the user to implement systems conformant to the CIPURSE™ open standard
implementing a secured, interoperable and flexible transit fare collection solution, including ISO 7816, ISO/IEC
14443-4 communication and AES-128 bit cryptography for multiple payment types.
The order option of the CIPURSE™ CL is conformant to the CIPURSE™ open standard [18] for both, the PICC and
then PCD software parts. It implements the by the OSPT alliance standardized application interface for the card
and the terminal side.
The scope of this certification of this TOE covers all parts of the CIPURSE™ CL which are later implemented by
the user on the user card respectively token based on this TOE and the functionality of the PCD software part
which is implemented in the terminal side. The PCD software operates also on the hardware of this TOE which is
implemented in the terminal.
The CIPURSE™ CL implements the by the OSPT alliance standardized application interface for the card and the
terminal side.

The NRG Software is a further order option and implements the routines for a NRG interface. The NRG
implements an operating system handling the emulation of an NRG card together with the RF interface. One
part of the NRG is permanently stored in the ROM and the second part consisting of patch and API is located in
the SOLID FLASH™ NVM. The second part is only present if the NRG is part of the delivery. If the NRG is not part
of the delivery the ROM part is present but not used. The NRG implements tearing safe behaviour in context with
the SOLID FLASH™ NVM management and is therefore independent from the HSL. The NRG is not part of the
TOE Security Functionality (TSF).

To fulfill the highest security requirements for smartcards today and also in the future, this TOE implements a
progressive digital security concept, which already has been certified in various forerunner processes. This TOE
utilizes digital security features to include customer friendly security, combined with a robust design overcoming
the disadvantages on analogue protection technologies. The TOE provides full on-chip encryption covering the
complete core, busses, memories and cryptographic co-processors leaving no plain data on the chip. A further
security feature has been implemented for this TOE protecting also the involved addresses transferred over the
memory bus. Therefore the attractiveness for attackers is a step further extremely reduced as encrypted signals
are of no use for the attacker – neither for manipulation nor for eavesdropping.
In addition, the TOE is equipped with a comprehensive error detection capability for the complete data path. The
dual CPU approach allows error detection even while processing. A comparator detects whether a calculation
was performed without errors. This approach does not leave any parts of the core circuitry unprotected. The
concept allows that the relevant attack scenarios are detected, whereas other conditions that would not lead to
an error would mainly be ignored. That renders the TOE robust against environmental influences.
Furthermore, the TOE implements what we call intelligent implicit shielding (I2). These measures constitute a
shield on sensitive and security critical signals which is not recognizable or obvious as a shield. This provides
excellent protection against invasive physical attacks, such as probing, forcing or similar.
In this Security Target the TOE is briefly described and a summary specification is given. The security
environment of the TOE durlock cipher modes as declared in this document and covering a wide range
of applications, the SCL offers in addition the flexibility to implement additional block cipher modes defined by
the user.
This library provides a simplified interface to the hardware Symmetric Cryptographic Coprocessor (SCP) and
preserves the security and performance requirements as required by the user.
Note that the definition of the key lengths follows the national AIS32 regulation regarding the 100 bit security
level by the BSI. This excludes the single DES operation from the certification.

Beside the inclusion and support of cryptographic libraries this TOE comes with the optional Hardware Support
Library (HSL) in different versions significantly simplifying the management of the SOLID FLASH™ NVM
functionality. The HSL constitutes an application interface (API) accessing the HSL state machine and
abstracting low level properties like special function registers and settings of specific hardware features. In short
the HSL provides a user friendly also useing its different phases of the lifecycle is defined. The assets are identified which
have to be protected through the security policy. The threats against these assets are described. The security
objectives and the security policy are defined, as well as the security requirements. These security requirements
are built out of the security functional requirements as part of the security policy and the security assurance
requirements. These are the formal steps applied during the evaluation and certification showing that the TOE
meets the targeted requirements. In additi case oriented interface considering endurance, reliability and
performance requirements.
In certain configurations each of the HSL versions provide also functions implementing tearing safe behavon, simplified functionality of the TOE matching the requirements is
described.

The assets, threats, security objectives and the security functional requirements are defiiour of
the SOLID FLASHned i facturer may
                                                                                     implement IC Security IC Embedded Software delivered
                                                                                     by the Security IC Embedded Software Developer
                                                                                     before TOE delivery (e.g. if the IC Security IC Embedded
                                                                                     Software is implemented in ROM or is stored in the
                                                                                     non-volatile memory as service provided by the IC
                                                                                     Manufacturer or IC Packaging Manufacturer).
                                    Composite Product                                The Composite Product Manufacturer has the following
                                    Manufacturer                                     roles (i) the Security IC Embedded Software Developer
                                                                                     (Phase 1), (ii) the Composite Product Integrator (Phase
                                                                                     5) and (iii) the Personalizer (Phase 6). If the TOE is
                                                                                     delivered after Phase 3 in form of wafers or sawn
                                                                                     wafers (dice) he has the role of the IC Packaging
                                                                                     Manufacturer (Phase 4) in addition. The customer of the
                                                                                     TOE Manufacturer who receives the TOE during TOE
                                                                                     Delivery. The Composite Product Manufacturer includes
                                                                                     the Security IC Embedded Software developer and all
                                                                                     roles after TOE Delivery up to Phase 6 (refer to Figure 2
                                                                                     on page 10 and Section 7.1.1).
                                    End-consumer                                     User of the Composite Product in Phase 7.
                                    IC Dedicated Software                            IC proprietary software embedded in a Security IC
                                                                                     (also known as IC firmware) and developed by the IC
                                                                                     Developer. Such software is required for testing purpose
                                                                                     (IC Dedicated Test Software) but may provide additional
Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                   All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                         Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                       27 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                            Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                Security Target Lite



                                                                                    services to facilitate usage of the hardware and/or
                                                                                    to provide additional services (IC Dedicated Support
                                                                                    Software).
                                    IC Dedicated Test Software That part of the IC Dedicated Software (refer to above)
                                                               which is used to test the TOE before TOE Delivery but
                                                               which does not provide any functionality thereafter.
                                    IC Dedicated Support                            That part of the IC Dedicated Software (refer to above)
                                    Software                                        which provides functions after TOE Delivery. The usage
                                                                                    of parts of the IC Dedicated Software might be restricted
                                                                                    to certain phases.
                                    Initialization Data                             Initialization Data defined by the TOE Manufacturer to
                                                                                    identify the TOE and to keep track of the Security IC’s
                                                                                    production and further life-cycle phases are considered
                                                                                    as belonging to the TSF data. These data are for
                                                                                    instance used for traceability and for TOE identification
                                                                                    (identification data).
                                    Integrated Circuit (IC)                         Electronic component(s) designed to perform processing
                                                                                    and/or memory functions.
                                    Memory                                          The memory comprises of the RAM, ROM and the Flash
                                                                                    of the TOE.
                                    Memory Management Unit                          The MMU maps the virtual addresses used by the CPU
                                                                                    into the physical addresses of RAM, ROM and Flash.
                                                                                    This mapping is done based on memory partitioning.
                                                                                    Memory partitioning is fixed.
                                    Pre-personalization Data                        Any data supplied by the Card Manufacturer that is
                                                                                    injected into the non-volatile memory by the Integrated
                                                                                    Circuits manufacturer (Phase 3). These data are for
                                                                                    instance used for traceability and/or to secure shipment
                                                                                    between phases.
                                    Security IC                                     (as used in this Protection Profile) Composition of the
                                                                                    TOE, the Security IC Embedded Software, user data of
                                                                                    the Composite TOE and the package (the Security IC
                                                                                    carrier).
                                    Security IC Embedded                            Software embedded in a Security IC and normally not
                                    Software                                        being developed by the IC Designer. The Security
                                                                                    IC Embedded Software is designed in Phase 1 and
                                                                                    embedded into the Security IC in Phase 3 or in later
                                                                                    phases of the Security IC product life-cycle. Some part
                                                                                    of that software may actually implement a Security
                                                                                    IC application others may provide standard services.
                                                                                    Nevertheless, this distinction doesn’t matter here
                                                                                    so that the Security IC Embedded Software can be
                                                                                    considered as being application dependent whereas the
                                                                                    IC Dedicated Software is definitely not.
                                    Security IC Product                             Composite product which includes the Security
                                                                                    Integrated Circuit (i.e. the TOE) and the Security IC
                                                                                    Embedded Software and is evaluated as composite

Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                  All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                        Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                      28 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                             Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                 Security Target Lite



                                                                                     target of evaluation in the sense of the Supporting
                                                                                     Document
                                    Secured Environment                              Operational environment maintains the confidentiality
                                                                                     and integrity of the TOE as addressed by OE.Process-
                                                                                     Sec-IC and the confidentiality and integrity of the IC
                                                                                     Security IC Embedded Software, TSF data or user data
                                                                                     associated with the product by security procedures of
                                                                                     the product manufacturer, personaliser and other actors
                                                                                     before delivery to the end-user depending on the life-
                                                                                     cycle.
                                    Test Features                                    All features and functions (implemented by the IC
                                                                                     Dedicated Test Software and/or hardware) which are
                                                                                     designed to be used before TOE Delivery only and
                                                                                     delivered as part of the TOE.
                                    TOE Delivery                                     The period when the TOE is delivered which is (refer to
                                                                                     Figure 2 on page 10) either (i) after Phase 3 (or before
                                                                                     Phase 4) if the TOE is delivered in form of wafers or
                                                                                     sawn wafers (dice) or (ii) after Phase 4 (or before Phase
                                                                                     5) if the TOE is delivered in form of packaged products.
                                    TOE Manufacturer                                 The TOE Manufacturer must ensure that all
                                                                                     requirements for the TOE (as defined in Section 1.2.2)
                                                                                     and its development and production environment
                                                                                     are fulfilled (refer to Figure 2 on page 10). The TOE
                                                                                     Manufacturer has the following roles: (i) IC Developer
                                                                                     (Phase 2) and (ii) IC Manufacturer (Phase 3). If the TOE
                                                                                     is delivered after Phase 4 in form of packaged products,
                                                                                     he has the role of the (iii) IC Packaging Manufacturer
                                                                                     (Phase 4) in addition.
                                    TSF data                                         DataData for the operation of the TOE upon which the
                                                                                     enforcement of the SFR relies. They are created by and
                                                                                     for the TOE, that might affect the operation of the TOE.
                                                                                     This includes information about the TOE’s configuration,
                                                                                     if any is coded in non-volatile non-programmable
                                                                                     memories (ROM), in non-volatile programmable
                                                                                     memories (for instance E2PROM or flash memory), in
                                                                                     specific circuitry or a combination thereof.
                                    User data of the Composite All data managed by the Security IC Embedded
                                    TOE                        Software in the application context.
                                    User data of the TOE                             Data for the user of the TOE, that does not affect
                                                                                     the operation of the TSF. From the point of view of
                                                                                     TOE defined in this PP the user data comprises the
                                                                                     Security IC Embedded Software and the user data of the
                                                                                     Composite TOE.




Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                   All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                         Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                       29 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                              Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite



9         Bibliography

                              9.1 Evaluation documents
                                    [1]    Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Part
                                           1: Introduction and general model, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017,
                                           CCMB-2017-04-001
                                    [2]    Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Part 2: Security
                                           functional components, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017, CCMB-2017-04-002
                                    [3]    Common Criteria for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Part 3: Security
                                           assurance components, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017, CCMB-2017-04-003
                                    [4]    Common Methodology for Information Technology Security Evaluation, Evaluation
                                           Methodology, Version 3.1, Revision 5, April 2017, CCMB-2017-04-004
                                    [5]    Security IC Platform Protection Profile with Augmentation Packages, Version 1.0,
                                           registered and certified by Bundesamt fuer Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik
                                           (BSI) under the reference BSI-PP-0084-2014

                              9.2 Developer documents
                                    [6]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Guidance – N7021 Crypto Library
                                    [7]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – Hash
                                    [8]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – SHA
                                    [9]    N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – RSA
                                    [10]   N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – RSA Key Generation
                                    [11]   N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – ECC over GF(p)
                                    [12]   N7021 Crypto Library: User Manual – UtilsAsym
                                    [13]   NXP Secure Smart Card Controller N7021 VA: Security Target, NXP
                                           Semiconductors

                              9.3 Standards
                                    [14] ISO 11568-4-2007: Banking – Key management (retail) – Part 4: Asymmetric
                                         cryptosystems – Key management and life cycle, 2007
                                    [15] ISO/IEC 11770-3-2015: Information technology - Security techniques - Key
                                         management - Part 3: Mechanisms using asymmetric techniques, 2015
                                    [16] FIPS PUB 180-4: Secure Hash Standard, Federal Information Processing
                                         Standards Publication, February 2011, US Department of Commerce/National
                                         Institute of Standards and Technology
                                    [17] FIPS PUB 186-4: Digital Signature Standard, Federal Information Processing
                                         Standards Publication, 2013, July, National Institute of Standards and Technology
                                    [18] ISO/IEC 14888-3:2015: Information technology – Security techniques – Digital
                                         signatures with appendix - Part 3: Discrete logarithm based mechanisms, 2016.
                                    [19] JIL-ATT-SC: Attack Methods for Smartcards and Similar Devices, Joint
                                         Interpretation Library, Version 2.2, January 2013
                                    [20] IEEE Std 1363™-2000: IEEE Standard Specifications for Public-Key Cryptography,
                                         IEEE Computer Society, 2005-12-12
                                    [21] ANSI X9.62: Public Key Cryptography for the Financial Services Industry, The
                                         Elliptic Curve Digital Signature Standard (ECDSA), American National Standard,
                                         November 16th, 2005


Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                    All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                          Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                        30 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                           Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                               Security Target Lite



                                    [22] ANSI X9.63: Public Key Cryptography for the Financial Services Industry, Key
                                         Agreement and Key Transport Using Elliptic Curve cryptography, American National
                                         Standard, January 2011
                                    [23] RFC 5639: Elliptic Curve Cryptography (ECC) Brainpool Standard - Curves and
                                         Curve Generation, IETF, March 2010
                                    [24] ANSSI 2011:http://www.legifrance.gouv.fr/affichTexte.do;jsessionid=?
                                         cidTexte=JORFTEXT000024668816




Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA                 All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2019. All rights reserved.

Product evaluation document                                       Rev. 2.3 — 5 June 2019
PUBLIC                                                                                                                                                     31 / 35
NXP Semiconductors                                                                                             Crypto Library Cobalt on N7021 VA
                                                                                                                                 Security Target Lite



10 Legal information

                            10.1 Definitions
                                    Draft — The document is a draft version only. The content is still under internal review
                                    and subject to formal approval, which may result in modifications or additions. NXP
                                    Semiconductors does not give any representations or warranties as to the accuracy
                                    or completeness of information included herein and shall have no liability for the
                                    consequences of use of such information.

                            10.2 Disclaimers
                                    Limited warranty and liability — Information in this document is believed to be accurate
                                    and reliable. However, NXP Semiconductors does not give any representations or
                                    warranties, expressed or implied, as to the accuracy or completeness of such information
                                    and shall have no liability for the consequences of use of such information. NXP
                                    Semiconductors takes no responsibility for the content in this document if provided by an
                                    information source outside of NXP Semiconductors.
                                    In no event shall NXP Semiconductors be liable for any indirect, incidental, punitive,
                                    special or consequential damages (including - without limitation - lost profits,        Support of Authentication of the Security IC ..................................................................................45
6.2           TOE Security Assurance Requirements ................................................................................................45
6.2.1            Refinements .....................................................................................................................................46
6.2.2            Security policy model details ..........................................................................................................47
6.3           Security Requirements Rationale .........................................................................................................48
6.3.1            Rationale for the Security Functional Requirements .....................................................................48
6.3.2            Rationale of the Assurance Requirements......................................................................................52
7             TOE Summary Specification (ASE_TSS) ...........................................................................53
7.1           SF_DPM: Device Phase Management ...................................................................................................53
7.2           SF_PS: Protection against Snooping....................................................................................................53
7.3           SF_PMA: Protection against Modifying Attacks ...................................................................................53
7.4           SF_PLA: Protection against Logical Attacks.........................................................................................53
7.5           SF_CS: Cryptographic Support .............................................................................................................53
7.6           Assignment of Security Functional Requirements to TOE’s Security Functionality...........................53
7.7           Security Requirements are internally consistent.................................................................................55
8             References ...................................................................................................................56
9             Appendix: hash signatures of NRGҹ SW ...........................................................................58
9.1           Hash Digests of the NrgOS.lib ...............................................................................................................58
9.2           Hash Digests of the NrgManagement.lib..............................................................................................58
10            Appendix: hash signatures of the HSL .............................................................................59
11            Appendix: hash signatures of UMSLC lib ..........................................................................60
12            Appendix: hash signatures of SCL ...................................................................................61
13            Appendix: hash signatures of ACL ...................................................................................62
14            List of Abbreviations .....................................................................................................63
15            Glossary.......................................................................................................................66
16            Revision History ...........................................................................................................68




Security Target                                                               3                                                                             v4.0
                                                                                                                                                      2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)


1                 Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)
1.1               ST reference
The ST has the revision v4.0 and is dated 2020-10-15. The title of this document IFX_CCI_00002Dh,
IFX_CCI_000039h, IFX_CCI_00003Ah, IFX_CCI_000044h, IFX_CCI_000045h, IFX_CCI_000046h, IFX_CCI_000047h,
IFX_CCI_000048h, IFX_CCI_000049h, IFX_CCI_00004Ah, IFX_CCI_00004Bh, IFX_CCI_00004Ch, IFX_CCI_00004Dh,
IFX_CCI_00004Eh T11 Security Target Lite.

1.2               TOE Reference
The ST comprises an Infineon Technologies Security Controller named IFX_CCI_00002Dh, IFX_CCI_000039h,
IFX_CCI_00003Ah, IFX_CCI_000044h, IFX_CCI_000045h, IFX_CCI_000046h, IFX_CCI_000047h, IFX_CCI_000048h,
IFX_CCI_000049h, IFX_CCI_00004Ah, IFX_CCI_00004Bh, IFX_CCI_00004Ch, IFX_CCI_00004Dh, IFX_CCI_00004Eh
design step T11 with firmware 80.306.16.0, optional NRGҹ SW 05.03.4097, optional HSL v3.52.9708, UMSLC lib
v01.30.0564, optional SCL v2.11.003, optional ACL v3.02.000and user guidance in the following called TOE
(Target of evaluation).
The ST is based on the Protection Profile [PP0084].
The Protection Profile and the ST are built in compliance to Common Criteria v3.1.
The targeted assurance level is EAL6+.




Security Target                                        4                                                v4.0
                                                                                                  2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)



Table 1       Identification
 Hardware                            Version                   Method of identification
 IFX_CCI_00002Dh,                    T11 (design step)         Non-ISO ATR
 IFX_CCI_000039h,
 IFX_CCI_00003Ah,
 IFX_CCI_000044h,
 IFX_CCI_000045h,
 IFX_CCI_000046h,
 IFX_CCI_000047h,
 IFX_CCI_000048h,
 IFX_CCI_000049h,
 IFX_CCI_00004Ah,
 IFX_CCI_00004Bh,
 IFX_CCI_00004Ch,
 IFX_CCI_00004Dh,
 IFX_CCI_00004Eh (each of the
 comma separated term is a
 Common Criteria Certification
 Identifier)
 firmware
 BOS & POWS                          80.306.16.0               Non-ISO ATR: firmware identifier
 Flash-loader                        09.12.0005                Flash-loader function
 Software
 NRGҹ SW (optional)                  05.03.4097                NRGҹ SW function
 HSL (optional)                      v3.52.9708                HSL function
 UMSLC                               v01.30.0564               UMSLC function
 SCL (optional)                      v2.11.003                 SCL function
 ACL (optional)                      v3.02.000                 ACL function
 User Guidance
 32-bit Security Controller – V11,                             document
 Hardware Reference Manual           V5.2, 2020-02-05
 32-bit Security Controllers,        V4.5, 2020-06-22          document
 SLx1/SLx3 Controller Family,
 Programmer’s Reference Manual
 32-bit Security Controller – V11,   v1.00-2661, 2020-10-05    document
 Security Guidelines
 Production and personalization      v.09.12, 2020-07-03       document
 32-bit ARM-based security
 controller
 32-bit Security Controller          V2.0, 2019-04-24          document
 Crypto2304T V3, User Manual
 HSL SLCx7 V11, Hardware Support     v3.52.9708, 2020-02-03    document
 Library (optional)
 UMSLC library for SLCx7 in 40nm,    v01.30.0564, 2019-06-19   document

Security Target                                         5                                       v4.0
                                                                                          2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 Hardware                             Version                               Method of identification
 SCL37-SCP-v440-C40                   v2.11.003, 2020-02-10                 document
 Symmetric Crypto Library for SCP-
 v440 AES/DES/MAC (optional)
 ACL37-Crypto2304T-C40                v3.02.000, 2020-02-07                 document
 Asymmetric Crypto Library for
 Crypto2304T RSA/ECC/Toolbox
 (optional)


A customer can identify the TOE hardware and its configuration (for details see chapter 1.4.7) using the Non-ISO
ATR. The Non-ISO ATR outputs a Common Criteria Certification Identifier and firmware identifier, which links
the TOE to this ST. Specific firmware functions can be used to determine the exact configuration of a device
from the certified range defined in Table 3.
The TOE can be ordered with a preloaded image. This image contains NVM loader functionality and is called
PFL (Performance Flash Loader) with version v09.10.90.9. The PFL is intended to be used in a secured
environment only and is not part of the TOE.

1.3               TOE Overview

1.3.1             TOE Definition and Usage
The TOE consists of smart card ICs (Security Controllers), firmware and user guidance meeting high
requirements in terms of performance and security designed by Infineon Technologies AG. This TOE is intended
to be used in smart cards for security-relevant applications and as developing platform for smart card
operating systems according to the lifecycle model from [PP0084]
The term Smartcard Embedded Software is used in the following for all operating systems and applications
stored and executed on the TOE. The TOE is the platform for the Smartcard Embedded Software. The
Smartcard Embedded Software itself is not part of the TOE. The TOE does not require any non-TOE
hardware/software/firmware.

1.3.2             TOE major security features
   Cryptographic support: TDES, AES, RSA, ECDSA, ECC, ECDH, RNG (Hybrid Random Number Generator PTG.3,
    True Random Number Generator PTG.2, Deterministic Random Number generator DRG.3 and DRG.4
    according to [BSI_RNGs])
   Memory protection unit supporting different memory access levels
   Memory encryption
   Robust set of sensors and detectors for the purpose of monitoring proper chip operating conditions
   Redundant alarm propagation and system deactivation principle
   Register protection
   Security life control
   Program flow integrity protection
   Peripheral access control
   Bus encryption for security peripherals
   Tearing safe NVM programming
   Security optimized wiring
   Leakage control of data dependent code execution

Security Target                                        6                                                     v4.0
                                                                                                       2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 Device phase management supporting isolation of test features and Flash Loader accessibility
 Detection of NVM single and multi bit errors



1.4                  TOE description

1.4.1                TOE components

1.4.1.1              Hardware components
Figure 1 shows a block diagram of the TOE hardware:
Figure 1      Block diagram of TOE hardware


                                                                Memory System

             Core:                                                     Solid FlashTM NVM     IFX ROM

                 CPU
                 NVIC             CPAU          Cache        ICS           Memory Bus (32 Bit)
                 MPU
                 ISS
                                                   ICS        Memory Bus (32 Bit)           RAM




                                                             Peripherals
                                                                           3x timer        Filters/
                                          SCP         RNG       µSM4                                    CRC
                                                                           & WDT           Sensors

                          SPAU                               Peripheral Bus (16 Bit)
                                                                              UART/            RF
                                     Crypto2304T      UMSLC         CLKU                                I2C
                                                                              GPIO          interface




The TOE hardware consists of a core, a memory system and peripherals.
The major components of the core system are a 32-bit CPU (Central Processing Unit), an MPU (Memory
Protection Unit), a Nested Vectored Interrupt Controller (NVIC) and an Instruction Stream Signature Checking
(ISS).
The MPU of the core stores code and data in a linear 4-GByte memory space (32-bit range), allowing direct
access without the need to swap memory segments in and out of memory using a memory protection unit.
There are two separate bus entities: a memory bus and a peripheral bus for high-speed communication with
the peripherals.
The SPAU can be configured by the user to block or allow peripheral access. It can also be used to block RAM
areas (For keeping Figure 1 simple, the connection between SPAU and RAM is not shown). The CPAU enables
the user to block or allow unprivileged level access to NVM and specific registers of ICS and NVM.
Security Target                                          7                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

The CPU accesses memory via the Internal Ciphering System (ICS), which encrypts/decrypts memory content.
All data of the memory block is encrypted. The NVM is equipped with an error correction code (ECC). Security
modules manage the alarms. Alarms may be triggered when the environmental conditions are outside the
specified operational range.
A set of sensors (temperature sensor, backside light detector, glitch sensor, low frequency sensor) is used to
detect excessive deviations from the specified operational range and serve for robustness of the TOE. The
UMSLC function can be used to test the alarm lines.
A Random Number Generator (RNG) consist of a physical Random Number Generator with a cryptographically
strong post processing unit. It can be operated in the modes as follows:
 True Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.2
 Hybrid Random Number Generation, meeting AIS31 PTG.3
 Deterministic Random Number Generation (DRNG) AIS31 DRG.3 and DRG.4

The Symmetric Cryptographic Processor (SCP) implements calculation of dual-key or triple-key triple-DES and
AES.
The µSM4 supports the Chinese standard encryption algorithm SM4.
The Crypto2304T co-processor provides basic means optimized for the implementation of fast and secure
software of many asymmetric or public key cryptographic schemes like RSA or elliptic curve based ones. The
user accessibility of the Crypto2304T is a customer ordering option
The implemented sleep mode logic (clock stop mode per ISO/IEC 7816-3) is used to reduce overall power
consumption.
The TOE is able to communicate using either its contact based or contactless interface (RF interface). The
contact based interface allows to use the ISO 7816 protocol via the UART. Further it offers a GPIO and an I2C
slave interface. The contactless interface can be configured to RFI or ACLB mode. Both interface types support
the signaling modes as follows:
 Signalling mode ISO/IEC 14443, Type A and Type B
 Signalling mode ISO/IEC 18092 passive mode, Type F
 NRGҹ interface

The UMSLC enables the user software to check the activity and proper function of the system’s security
features.
The Clock Unit (CLKU) supplies the clocks for all components of the TOE. The Clock Unit can work in internal
and external clock mode. When operating the internal clock mode the system frequency is derived from an
oscillator, whereas in external clock mode, the system clock is derived from an externally supplied interface
clock.
The watchdog timer triggers an event in case of a counter overflow. The timers are general purpose up-
counting timers.
A CRC (Cyclic Redundancy Check) module computes a checksum value from a message or any other block of
data.
The ROM is used by IFX only. The user software has to be implemented in SOLID FLASHҹ memory. The user can
choose, whether the software is loaded into the SOLID FLASHҹ memory by Infineon Technologies AG or by the
user.
The TOE uses Special Function Registers (SFRs). These SFRs are used for general purposes and chip
configuration; they are located in SOLID FLASHҹ memory in a configuration area page. The Online

Security Target                                         8                                                     v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

Configuration Check (OCC) function is used for register protection, i.e. controls the modification of relevant
SFR settings.
In case a security violation is detected, secure state is entered by the hardware.

1.4.1.2            Firmware and software components
The TOE provides low-level firmware components: the Boot Software (BOS), the Performance Optimized Write
Scheme (POWS) and the Flash Loader (FL).
The BOS firmware is used for test purposes during start-up and the FL allows downloading of user software to
the NVM during the manufacturing process. All mandatory functions for start-up and internal testing are
protected by a dedicated hardware firewall with two levels “BOS” and “user”.
The POWS library is an internal firmware library, i.e. not accessible by the user. It is used by the BOS and FL to
store data in NVM in a tearing safe manner.
The Flash Loader allows downloading of User Software into the NVM during the manufacturing process.
The software of the TOE consists of optional packages:
   NRGҹ SW: The optional NRGҹ SW supports Card and Reader Mode, e.g. card creation, personalization and
    deletion. The NRGҹ SW does not implement any security functionality
   HSL: The optional HSL provides functionality via APIs to the Smartcard Embedded Software . which
    contains SOLID FLASHҹ NVM service routines and functionality for tearing safe programming of SOLID
    FLASHҹ NVM.
   UMSLC lib: this library provides a wrapper around the UMSLC hardware functionality with measures to
    counter fault attacks.
   Symmetric Crypto Library (SCL): The optional SCL is used to provide a high level interface to the TDES and
    AES cryptography, which is partly implemented on the hardware component SCP and includes
    countermeasures against SPA, DPA and DFA attacks. The SCL is delivered as object code and in this way
    integrated into the user software.
   Asymmetric Crypto Library (ACL): The optional ACL implements RSA and elliptic curve based cryptographic
    schemes

1.4.1.3            User Guidance components
The user guidance consists of the components as follows:
   32-bit Security Controller – V11, Hardware Reference Manual: description of hardware features and user
    interfaces
   32-bit ARM-based Securtity Controller, SLC 37/(40-nm Technology), Programmer’s Reference Manual:
    description of firmware principles (including NRGҹ SW) relevant for IC embedded software.
   Production and personalization 32-bit ARM-based security cvontroller in 40 nm:contains detailed
    information about the usage of the Flash Loader
   32-bit Security Controller – V11, Security Guidelines: provides the guidance and recommendations to
    develop secure software for and secure usage of this TOE.
   32-bit Security Controller Crypto2304T V3, User Manual: This manual describes the functionality of the
    Crypto2304T module and is intended for experienced crypto library developers
   HSL SLCx7 V11, Hardware Support Library: provides an application interface (API) description and security
    guidelines for the optional HSL software part.
   UMSLC library for SLCx7 in 40nm User Mode Security Life Control, Version 01.00.0234: provides some
    guidelines, how to use the UMSLC library

Security Target                                          9                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                           2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 SCL37-SCP-v440-C40 Symmetric Crypto Library for SCP-v440 AES/DES/MAC: User Interface, contains all
  interfaces of the SCL. This document is only delivered to the user in case the SCL is part of the delivered
  TOE.
 ACL37-Crypto2304T-C40 Asymmetric Crypto Library for Crypto2304T RSA/ECC/Toolbox: provides an
  application interface (API) description and security guidelines for the optional ACL software part.

1.4.2              Physical scope of the TOE
The physical scope of the TOE is defined by the TOE components described in chapter 1.4.1

1.4.3              Logical scope of the TOE
The logical scope of the TOE consists of the logical security features provided by the TOE. These features are
listed in chapter 1.3.2. More details are provided in this chapter:
   Cryptographic support: TDES, AES (block cipher modes ECB, CBC, CFB, CTR and CMAC), RNG (Hybrid
    Random Number Generator PTG.3, True Random Number Generator PTG.2, Deterministic Random Number
    generator DRG.3 and DRG.4 according to [BSI_RNGs]), RSA, ECC, ECDSA, ECDH.
   Memory protection unit supporting up to eight memory regions with different access rights and two
    privilege levels “privileged” and “user”. “User” level is more restricted in using TOE resources compared to
    “privileged”
   Memory encryption: all data of memories ROM, RAM and NVM are encrypted. Addresses are scrambled to
    disguise the location of data
   Robust set of sensors and detectors for the purpose of monitoring proper chip operating conditions
    consisting of a temperature sensor, backside light detector, glitch sensor and low frequency sensor.
   Redundant alarm propagation and system deactivation principle, which decreases the risk of manipulation
    and tampering.
   Register protection: protection of security relevant registers against fault attacks using OCC.
   Security life control: a life test on specific security features can be used by the IC embedded software to
    detect manipulation of these security features
   Program flow integrity protection: The Instruction Stream Signature Checking (ISS) can be employed by the
    IC embedded software to detect illegal program flows and trigger an alarm. The TOE also contains a
    watchdog, which may be used to detect program flow manipulations.
   Peripheral access control: The TOE allows the IC embedded software to lock certain peripherals
    dynamically.
   Bus encryption for security peripherals: All data transfers to and from dedicated peripherals are encrypted
    dynamically.
   Tearing safe NVM programming: the HSL provides specific routines provided for tearing safe programming.
    These routines prevent an unspecified interim state by either propagating the pre- or post-programming
    condition.
   Security optimized wiring: shield lines in combination with layout measures reduce the risk of successful
    manipulative attacks.
   Leakage control of data dependant code execution: dedicated measures allow the user to reduce such
    leakage.
   Device phase management supporting isolation of test features and Flash Loader accessibility: dedicated
    test features employed during production are switched off before customer delivery. The Flash Loader
    usage to download flash data requires either a mutual authentication or a one way user authentication
    depending on the order option EA. The Flash Loader supports permanent deactivation.



Security Target                                         10                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

  Detection of NVM single and multi bit errors: Single bit errors are detected and corrected and multi bit errors
   detected.
Features, which are not mentioned here do not directly contribute to the SFRs.

1.4.4              Interfaces of the TOE
   The physical interface of the TOE to the external environment is the entire surface of the IC.
   The electrical interface of the TOE to the external environment is constituted by the pads of the chip:
             o The five ISO 7816 pads consist particularly of the contacted RES, I/O, CLK lines and supply lines
                 VCC and GND. The contact based communication is according to ISO 7816/ETSI/EMV.
             o The I2C communication can be driven via the ISO 7816 pads. In this case no other
                 communication using the ISO 7816 pads is possible.
   The RF interface (radio frequency power and signal interface) enables contactless communication between
    a PICC (proximity integration chip card) and a PCD reader/writer (proximity coupling device). Power supply
    is received and data are received or transmitted by an antenna which consists of a coil with a few turns
    directly connected to the IC.
   The data-oriented I/O interface of the TOE is represented by the I/O pad.
   The interface between firmware and hardware consists of special registers used for hardware configuration
    and control (Special Function Registers, SFR).
   Optional: The interface of the TOE to the operating system is covered by the optional HSL routines and by
    the instruction set of the TOE.
   Optional: The interface of the NRGҹ SW defined by the NRGҹ SW
   The interface of the UMSLC lib defined by the UMSLC lib
   Optional: The interface to the SCL calculations is defined by the SCL
   Optional: The interface to the ACL calculations is defined by the ACL

1.4.5              Forms of Delivery
The TOE can be delivered in the form of complete modules, as plain wafers in an IC case (e.g. DSO20) or in bare
dies. The delivery can therefore be at the end of phase 3 or at the end of phase 4 which may also include pre-
personalization steps according to [PP0084]. This means phase 4 is also part of the evaluation process. In any
case the testing of the TOE is finished and the extended test features are removed. From a security policy point
of view the different forms of delivery do not have any impact.
The delivery to the software developer (phase 2  phase 1) contains the documents as described above.
Part of the software delivery is the Flash Loader program, provided by Infineon Technologies AG, running on
the TOE and controlling the download of user software onto the TOE via the UART or RF interface. The
download is only possible after successful authentication. The user software and data must be encrypted
before download. In addition, the user can permanently block further use of the Flash Loader.
The table as follows provides an overview about form and method of TOE deliveries:

Table 2       TOE deliveries: forms and methods
TOE Component                       Delivered         Delivery Method      Comment
                                    Format
Hardware




Security Target                                         11                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

TOE Component                               Delivered             Delivery Method         Comment
                                            Format
IFX_CCI_00002Dh,                            Wafer, IC case,       Postal transfer in      All materials are delivered to
IFX_CCI_000039h,                            packages              cages                   distribution centers in cages,
IFX_CCI_00003Ah,                                                                          locked.
IFX_CCI_000044h,
IFX_CCI_000045h,
IFX_CCI_000046h,
IFX_CCI_000047h,
IFX_CCI_000048h,
IFX_CCI_000049h,
IFX_CCI_00004Ah,
IFX_CCI_00004Bh,
IFX_CCI_00004Ch,
IFX_CCI_00004Dh,
IFX_CCI_00004Eh T11
Firmware
All                                         –                     –                       stored on the delivered hardware.
Software
All software libraries                      L251 Library          Secured                 –
                                            File (object          download1
                                            code)
PFL (not part of the TOE)                       Preloaded         Part of IC              –
                                                  image
Guidance Documentation
All User Guidance documents                 Personalized          Secured                 –
                                            PDF                   download1

1.4.6                   Production sites
The TOE may be handled at different production sites but the silicon is produced at Global Foundries fab 7 in
Singapore only. The production site can be determined by the non-ISO ATR.
The delivery measures are described in the ALC_DVS aspect.

1.4.7                   TOE Configuration
This TOE is represented by various configurations called products.
The module design, layout and footprint, of all products are identical.
The degree of freedom for configuring the TOE is predefined by Infineon Technologies AG. Table 3 shows the
TOE hardware/firmware configurations:

Table 3          TOE hardware/firmware configuration options
    Memory                                         Values                                     Identification
    SOLID FLASHҹ                                   up to 512 kBytes                           IFX-Mailbox

1
    Secured download is a way of delivery of documentation and TOE related software using a secure ishare connected to Infineon
      customer portal. The TOE user needs a DMZ Account to login (authenticate) via the Internet.

Security Target                                                       12                                                          v4.0
                                                                                                                            2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 Memory                                  Values                              Identification
 RAM                                     up to 16 kBytes                     IFX-Mailbox
 Peripherals                             Values                              Identification
 Crypto2304T                             Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 µSM4                                    Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 NRGҹ Crypto Module                      Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 Interface and protocol                  Values                              Identification
 I2C                                     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 RFI                                     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 ACLB                                    Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 Signaling mode ISO/IEC 14443 Type A     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 Signaling mode ISO/IEC 14443 Type B     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 Signaling mode ISO/IEC 18092            Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 passive mode, Type F
 ACM                                     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 AMM                                     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 AFM                                     Available/unavailable               Hardware register
 Input capacitance [pF]                  (27/56/78)                          GCIM
 BPU                                     Available/unavailable               IFX-Mailbox
 EA                                      Available/unavailable               Flash loader function

Further the Flash Loader can be configured in different ways as explained in the following section.

1.4.8              TOE initialization with Customer Software
This TOE is equipped with Flash Loader software (FL) to download user software, i.e. an operating system and
applications. Various options can be chosen by the user to store software onto the SOLID FLASHҹ NVM:

Table 4       Order Options to initialize the TOE with customer software
 Case              Option                              Flash loader status
 1                 The user or/and a subcontractor     The Flash Loader can be activated or reactivated by
                   downloads the software into the     the user or subcontractor to download software into
                   SOLID FLASHҹ memory. Infineon       the SOLID FLASHҹ memory. In case the Flash Loader is
                   Technologies does not receive any   active, it may be either in life cycle stage “Pinletter” or
                   user software.                      “Activated”. When “Activated” a mutual
                                                       authentication needs to be performed or if TOE is
                                                       ordered with EA available a one-way authentication
                                                       from user towards Flash Loader, before download can
                                                       be started. In “Pinletter” a valid Pinletter provided by
                                                       Infineon Technologies AG needs to be presented to
                                                       enter “Activated” stage.
 2                 The user provides software to       There is no Flash Loader present.
                  esults of successful attacks against the TOE but the
                       attack itself is not relevant for the TOE.

                 3.5 Threats
                       The TOE in collaboration with its IT environment shall avert the threats as specified
                       below.
                       T.Read_Sensitive_Data Read the sensitive biometric reference data
                       An attacker tries to gain the sensitive biometric reference data through the
                       communication interface of the travel document’s chip.
                       The attack T.Read_Sensitive_Data is similar to the threat T.Skimming (cf. [6]) in respect
                       of the attack path (communication interface) and the motivation (to get data stored on the
                       travel document’s chip) but differs from those in the asset under the attack (sensitive
                       biometric reference data vs. digital MRZ, digitized portrait and other data), the
                       opportunity (i.e. knowing the PACE Password) and therefore the possible attack
                       methods. Note, that the sensitive biometric reference data are stored only on the travel
                       document’s chip as private sensitive personal data whereas the MRZ data and the
                       portrait are visually readable on the physical part of the travel document as well.
                       T.Counterfeit             Counterfeit MRTD’s chip
                       An attacker with high attack potential produces an unauthorized copy or reproduction of a
                       genuine travel document’s chip to be used as part of a counterfeit travel document. This
                       violates the authenticity of the travel document’s chip used for authentication of a
                       traveller by possession of a travel document.
                       The attacker may generate a new data set or extract completely or partially the data from
                       a genuine travel document’s chip and copy them to another appropriate chip to imitate
                       this genuine travel document’s chip.
                       T.Skimming          Skimming travel document / Capturing card-Terminal communication




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                20 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                       An attacker imitates an inspection system in order to get access to the user data stored
                       on or transferred between the TOE and the inspecting authority connected via the
                       contactless/contact interface of the TOE.
                       T.Eavesdropping           Eavesdropping on the communication between the TOE and the
                       PACE terminal
                       An attacker is listening to the communication between the travel document and the
                       PACE authenticated BIS-PACE in order to gain the user data transferred between the
                       TOE and the terminal connected.
                       T.Tracing           Counterfeit MRTD’s chip
                       An attacker tries to gather TOE tracing data (i.e. to trace the movement of the travel
                       document) unambiguously identifying it remotely by establishing or listening to a
                       communication via the contactless/contact interface of the TOE.
                       T.Forgery           Forgery of data on MRTD’s chip
                       An attacker fraudulently alters the User Data or/and TSF-data stored on the travel
                       document or/and exchanged between the TOE and the terminal connected in order to
                       outsmart the PACE authenticated BIS-PACE by means of changed travel document
                       holder’s related reference data (like biographic or biometric data). The attacker does it in
                       such a way that the terminal connected perceives these modified data as authentic one.
                       T.Abuse-Func                    Abuse of Functionality
                       An attacker may use functions of the TOE which shall not be used in TOE operational
                       phase in order
                           (i) to manipulate or to disclose the User Data stored in the TOE,
                           (ii) to manipulate or to disclose the TSF-data stored in the TOE or
                           (iii) to manipulate (bypass, deactivate or modify) soft-coded security functionality of
                                 the TOE.
                       This threat addresses the misuse of the functions for the initialisation and personalisation
                       in the operational phase after delivery to the travel document holder.
                       T.Information_Leakage Information Leakage from MRTD’s chip
                       An attacker may exploit information leaking from the TOE during its usage in order to
                       disclose confidential User Data or/and TSF-data stored on the travel document or/and
                       exchanged between the TOE and the terminal connected. The information leakage may
                       be inherent in the normal operation or caused by the attacker.
                       T.Phys-Tamper             Physical Tampering
                       An attacker may perform physical probing of the travel document in order
                           (i) to disclose the TSF-data, or
                           (ii) to disclose/reconstruct the TOE’s Embedded Software.
                       An attacker may physically modify the travel document in order to alter
                           (i) its security functionality (hardware and software part, as well),
                           (ii) the User Data or the TSF-data stored on the travel document.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                21 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                    Security Target Lite



                       T.Malfunction             Counterfeit MRTD’s chip
                       An attacker may cause a malfunction the travel document’s hardware and Embedded
                       Software by applying environmental stress in order to
                            (i) deactivate or modify security features or functionality of the TOE’ hardware or to
                            (ii) circumvent, deactivate or modify security functions of the TOE’s Embedded
                                  Software. This may be achieved e.g. by operating the travel document outside
                                  the normal operating conditions, exploiting errors in the travel document’s
                                  Embedded Software or misusing administrative functions. To exploit these
                                  vulnerabilities an attacker needs information about the functional operation.

                 3.6 Organisational Security Policies
                       The TOE shall comply with the following Organizational Security Policies (OSP) as
                       security rules, procedures, practices, or guidelines imposed by an organization upon its
                       operations.
                       P.Sensitive_Data          Privacy of sensitive biometric reference data
                       The biometric reference data of finger(s) (EF.DG3) and iris image(s) (EF.DG4) are
                       sensitive private personal data of the travel document holder. The sensitive biometric
                       reference data can be used only by inspection systems which are authorized for this
                       access at the time the travel document is presented to the inspection system (Extended
                       Inspection Systems). The issuing State or Organisation authorizes the Document
                       Verifiers of the receiving States to manage the authorization of inspection systems within
                       the limits defined by the Document Verifier Certificate. The travel document’s chip shall
                       protect the confidentiality and integrity of the sensitive private personal data even during
                       transmission to the Extended Inspection System after Chip Authentication Version 1.
                       P.Manufact                Manufacturing of the MRTD’s chip
                       The Initialization Data are written by the IC Manufacturer to identify the IC uniquely. The
                       travel document Manufacturer writes the Pre-personalisation Data which contains at least
                       the Personalisation Agent Key.
                       P.Personalization                     Personalization of the MRTD by issuing State or Organization
                       The issuing State or Organisation guarantees the correctness of the biographical data,
                       the printed portrait and the digitized portrait, the biometric reference data and other data
                       of the logical travel document with respect to the travel document holder. The
                       personalisation of the travel document for the holder is performed by an agent authorized
                       by the issuing State or Organisation only.
                       This PP includes all OSPs from the PACE PP, chap 3.3, namely P.Pre-Operational,
                       P.Card_PKI, P.Trustworthy_PKI, P.Manufact and P.Terminal. Due to identical definitions
                       and names they are also not repeated here.
                       P.Pre-operational                     Pre-operational handling of the travel document
                       1)     The travel document Issuer issues the travel document and approves it using the
                              terminals complying with all applicable laws and regulations.




                                       All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                          Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                22 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                         ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                   Security Target Lite



                       2)    The travel document Issuer guarantees correctness of the user data (amongst
                             other of those, concerning the travel document holder) and of the TSF-data
                             permanently stored in the TOE.
                       3)    The travel document Issuer uses only such TOE’s technical components (IC)
                             which enable traceability of the travel documents in their manufacturing and
                             issuing life cycle phases, i.e. before they are in the operational phase.
                       4)    If the travel document Issuer authorises a Personalisation Agent to personalise the
                             travel document for travel document holders, the travel document Issuer has to
                             ensure that the Personalisation Agent acts in accordance with the travel document
                             Issuer’s policy.
                       P.Card_PKI                           PKI for Passive Authentication
                       1)    The travel document Issuer shall establish a public key infrastructure for the
                             passive authentication, i.e. for digital signature creation and verification for the
                             travel document. For this aim, he runs a Country Signing Certification Authority
                             (CSCA). The travel document Issuer shall publish the CSCA Certificate (CCSCA) .
                       2)    The CSCA shall securely generate, store and use the CSCA key pair. The CSCA
                             shall keep the CSCA Private Key secret and issue a self-signed CSCA Certificate
                             (CCSCA) having to be made available to the travel document Issuer by strictly
                             secure means, see [11], 5.5.1. The CSCA shall create the Document Signer
                             Certificates for the Document Signer Public Keys (CDS) and make them available
                             to the travel document Issuer, see [11], 5.5.1.
                       3)    A Document Signer shall (i) generate the Document Signer Key Pair, (ii) hand over
                             the Document Signer Public Key to the CSCA for certification, (iii) keep the
                             Document Signer Private Key secret and (iv) securely use the Document Signer
                             Private Key for signing the Document Security Objects of travel documents.
                       P.Trustworth_PKI                     Trustworthiness of the PKI
                       The CSCA shall ensure that it issues its certificates exclusively to the rightful
                       organisations (DS) and DSs shall ensure that they sign exclusively correct Document
                       Security Objects to be stored on the travel document.
                       P.Terminal                       Personalization of the MRTD by issuing State or Organization
                       only
                       The Basic Inspection Systems with PACE (IS-PACE) shall operate their terminals as
                       follows:
                       1)    The related terminals (basic inspection system, cf. above) shall be used by
                             terminal operators and by travel document holders.
                       2)    They shall implement the terminal parts of the PACE protocol, of the Passive
                             Authentication and use them in this order. The PACE terminal shall use randomly
                             and (almost) uniformly selected nonces, if required by the protocols (for generating
                             ephemeral keys for Diffie-Hellmann).
                       3)    The related terminals need not to use any own credentials.
                       4)    They shall also store the Country Signing Public Key and the Document Signer
                             Public Key (in form of CCSCA and CDS) in order to enable and to perform Passive




                                      All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                         Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                23 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                        ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                                  Security Target Lite



                            Authentication (determination of the authenticity of data groups stored in the travel
                            document).
                       5)   The related terminals and their environment shall ensure confidentiality and
                            integrity of respective data handled by them (e.g. confidentiality of PACE
                            passwords, integrity of PKI certificates, etc.), where it is necessary for a secure
                            operation of the TOE according to the current PP.




                                     All information provided in this document is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All rights reserved.

Evaluation documentation                        Rev. 1.0 — 12 February 2020                                                                24 of 93
PUBLIC
NXP Semiconductors                                          ChipDoc v3 ICAO EAC with PACE on JCOP 4 P71
                                                                                                   download into the SOLID FLASHҹ
                   memory to Infineon Technologies
                   AG. The software is loaded into
                   the SOLID FLASHҹ memory during

Security Target                                        13                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                          2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Target Introduction (ASE_INT)

 Case             Option                             Flash loader status
                  chip production.
 3                The user provides software to      The Flash Loader is blocked by Infineon but can be
                  download into the SOLID FLASHҹ     activated or reactivated by the user or subcontractor
                  memory to Infineon Technologies    to download software into the SOLID FLASHҹ
                  AG. The software is loaded into    memory. The user is required to provide a reactivation
                  the NVM memory during chip         procedure as part of the software to Infineon
                  production.                        Technologies AG.
 4                The user provides software to      The Flash Loader is active. The user can either
                  download into the SOLID FLASHҹ     download software or activate the software already
                  memory to Infineon Technologies    present in SOLID FLASHҹ memory.
                  AG. The software is loaded into
                  the NVM memory during chip
                  production.
 5                Infineon Technologies AG           The Flash Loader is active. The user can either
                  preloades PFL into SOLID FLASHҹ.   download software and erase the PFL or activate the
                                                     PFL present in SOLID FLASHҹ memory. Note, that PFL
                                                     is not part of the TOE., i.e. activating the PFL is outside
                                                     of the scope of this certification.




Security Target                                      14                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)


2                        Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)
2.1                      Conformance Claims (ASE CCL)
This ST and TOE claim conformance to CC v3.1 revision 5. The ST claims conformance to [CCBook3]. It is
[CCBook2] extended.

2.1.1                    PP Claim
This ST is strictly conformant to [PP0084]. The assurance level is EAL6+. The augmentation is achieved - with
regard to [CCBook3]: Security assurance components by including:

Table 5          Augmentations of the assurance level of the TOE
    Assurance Class                              Assurance Family                             Description
    Life-cycle support                           ALC_FLR.1                                    Basic flaw remediation

The Security IC Platform Protection Profile with Augmentation Packages is registered and certified by the
Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik1 (BSI) under the reference [PP0084].
The security assurance requirements of the TOE are according to [PP0084 and [CCBook3].

2.1.2                    Package Claim
This ST claims conformance to the following additional packages taken from [PP0084]:
 Package Authentication of the Security IC, section 7.2, conformant.
      This package is only claimed in case TOE is ordered with configuration option EA unavailable.
     Package Loader, Package 1: Loader dedicated for usage in secured environment only, section 7.3.1,
      conformant
      This package is optional and fulfilled only by TOE products with Flash Loader.
     Package Loader, Package 2: Loader dedicated for usage by authorized users only,
      section 7.3.2, augmented
      This package is optional and fulfilled only by TOE products with Flash Loader and configuration option EA
      unavailable.
     Package TDES ; section 7.4.1, augmented
     Package AES ; section 7.4.2, augmented
The assurance level for the TOE is EAL6 augmented with the component ALC_FLR.1.Therefore this ST is
package-augmented to the packages in [PP0084].

2.1.3                    Conformance Rationale
The TOE is a typical security IC as defined in [PP0084] chapter 1.2.2 comprising:
 the circuitry of the IC (hardware including the physical memories),
 configuration data, initialization data related to the IC Dedicated Software and the behaviour of the security
  functionality
 the IC Dedicated Software with the parts


1
    Bundesamt für Sicherheit in der Informationstechnik (BSI) is the German Federal Office for Information Security


Security Target                                                      15                                                      v4.0
                                                                                                                       2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Conformance Claims (ASE_CCL)

 the IC Dedicated Test Software,
 the IC Dedicated Support Software.

The TOE is designed, produced and/or generated by the TOE Manufacturer.
The security problem definition of [PP0084] is enhanced by adding additional threats and an environmental
objective. Including these add-ons, the security problem definition of this ST is consistent with the statement of
the security problem definition in [PP0084], as the ST claims strict conformance to [PP0084].
The threat memory access violation T.Mem-Access has been added, due to specific TOE memory access control
functionality. This add-on has no impact on the conformance statements regarding [CCbook1] and [PP0084]
with following rational:
   The security target remains conformant to [CCbook1], claim 576 as the possibility to introduce additional
    restrictions is given.
 The security target fulfils the strict conformance claim of [PP0084] due to the application notes 5, 6 and 7
    which apply here. By those notes the addition of further security functions and security services are
    covered, even without deriving particular security functionality from a threat but from a policy.
The threat T.Open_Samples_Diffusion is added in case physical protection during TOE delivery to customers is
omitted. This threat increases the scope of threats and does not contradict to any of the defined threats of
[PP0084].
The environmental objective OE.Prevent_Masquerade is added to require the environment to add additional
measures in case EA is available in order to prevent masquerading attacks. The strict conformance to [PP0084]
is still met, because the ability of the TOE to prevent masquerading attacks is met by an optional package , i.e.
“Package Authentication of the Security IC”. In case this package is not claimed, the TOE does not provide
sufficient measures to prevent masquerading. Requesting the environment to fill this gap is an important
requirement, if masquerading attacks are considered relevant. [PP0084] does not add any considerations in
case the TOE does not claim this package.




Security Target                                         16                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                        2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)


3                  Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)
The content of [PP0084] applies to this chapter completely.

3.1                Threats
The threats are directed against the assets and/or the security functions of the TOE. For example, certain
attacks are only one step towards a disclosure of assets while others may directly lead to a compromise of the
application security. The more detailed description of specific attacks is given later on in the process of
evaluation and certification. An overview on attacks is given in [PP0084] section 3.2.
The threats to security are defined and described in [PP0084] sections 3.2 and 7.2.1.

Table 6       Threats according to [PP0084]
 T.Phys-Manipulation         Physical Manipulation
 T.Phys-Probing              Physical Probing
 T.Malfunction               Malfunction due to Environmental Stress
 T.Leak-Inherent             Inherent Information Leakage
 T.Leak-Forced               Forced Information Leakage
 T.Abuse-Func                Abuse of Functionality
 T.RND                       Deficiency of Random Numbers
 T.Masquerade_TOE            Masquerade the TOE

3.1.1              Additional Threat due to TOE specific Functionality
The additional functionality of introducing sophisticated privilege levels and access control allows the secure
separation between the operation system(s) and applications, the secure downloading of applications after
personalization and enables multitasking by separating memory areas and performing access controls
between different applications. Due to this additional functionality “area based memory access control” a new
threat is introduced.
The TOE shall avert the threat “Memory Access Violation (T.Mem-Access)” as specified below:
T.Mem-Access           Memory Access Violation
                       Parts of the Smartcard Embedded Software may cause security violations by
                       accidentally or deliberately accessing restricted data (which may include code) or
                       privilege levels. Any restrictions are defined by the security policy of the specific
                       application context and must be implemented by the Smartcard Embedded Software.
“Diffusion of open samples” threat:
T.Open_Samples_Diffusion Diffusion of Open Samples
                       An attacker may get access to open samples of the TOE and use them to gain
                       information about the TSF (loader, memory management unit, ROM code …). He may
                       also use the open samples to characterize the behavior of the IC and its security
                       functionalities (for example: characterization of side channel profiles, perturbation
                       cartography …). The execution of a dedicated security features (for example: execution
                       of a DES computation without countermeasures or by de-activating countermeasures)



Security Target                                        17                                                    v4.0
                                                                                                       2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security Problem Definition (ASE_SPD)

                        through the loading of an adequate code would allow this kind of characterization and
                        the execution of enhanced attacks on the IC.

Table 7       Additional threats due to TOE specific functions and augmentations
 T.Mem-Access                         Memory Access Violation
 T.Open_Samples_Diffusion             Diffusion of Open Samples

3.1.2               Assets regarding the Threats
The asset description from [PP0084] section 3.1 applies.

3.2                 Organizational Security Policies
The organizational policies from [PP0084] sections 3.3, 7.3.1, 7.3.2 and 7.4 are applicable.

Table 8       Organizational Security Policies according [PP0084]
 P.Process-TOE                        Protection during TOE Development and Production
 P.Crypto-Service                     Cryptographic services of the TOE
 P.Lim_Block_Loader                   Limiting and Blocking the Loader Functionality
 P.Ctrl_Loader (only available , if   Controlled usage to Loader Functionality
 Flash Loader active)

3.3                 Assumptions
The TOE assumptions about the operational environment are defined and described in [PP0084] section 3.4.

Table 9       Assumption according [PP0084]
 A.Process-Sec-IC                              Protection during Packaging, Finishing and Personalization
 A.Resp-Appl                                   Treatment of User Data




Security Target                                         18                                                  v4.0
                                                                                                      2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)


4                   Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)
This section shows the security objectives, which are relevant to the TOE.

4.1                 Security objectives of the TOE
The security objectives of the TOE are defined and described in[PP0084] sections 4.1, 7.2.1, 7.3.1, 7.3.2, 7.4.1
and 7.4.2

Table 10      Objectives for the TOE according to [PP0084]
 O.Phys-Manipulation          Protection against Physical Manipulation
 O.Phys-Probing               Protection against Physical Probing
 O.Malfunction                Protection against Malfunction
 O.Leak-Inherent              Protection against Inherent Information Leakage

 O.Leak-Forced                Protection against Forced Information Leakage

 O.Abuse-Func                 Protection against Abuse of Functionality

 O.Identification             TOE Identification
 O.RND                        Random Numbers
 O.Cap_Avail_Loader           Capability and availability of the Loader
 O.Ctrl_Auth_Loader           Access control and authenticity for the Loader
 (only available , if Flash
 Loader active)
 O.Authentication             Authentication to external entities
 (only available , if Flash
 Loader active and TOE is
 ordered with
 configuration option EA
 unavailable)
 O.TDES                       Cryptographic service Triple-DES
 O.AES                        Cryptographic service AES

The TOE shall provide “Area based Memory Access Control (O.Mem-Access)” as specified below.
O.Mem-Access                    Area based Memory Access Control
                                The TOE must provide the Smartcard Embedded Software with the capability to
                                define restricted access memory areas. The TOE must then enforce the
                                partitioning of such memory areas so that access of software to memory areas
                                and privilege levels is controlled as required, for example, in a multi-application
                                environment.
The TOE shall provide TSF confidentiality protection as specified below:
O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality Protection of confidentiality of TSF




Security Target                                          19                                                     v4.0
                                                                                                          2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)

                                 The TOE must provide protection against disclosure of confidential operations
                                 of the security IC (loader, memory management unit, …) through the use of a
                                 dedicated code loaded on open samples.
The TOE shall provide “RSA cryprographic services (O.RSA)” and “Elliptic Curve cryptographic services (O.ECC)”
as specified below.
O.RSA                         RSA cryptographic services
                              The TOE shall provide the following specific security functionality to the
                              Smartcard Embedded Software: Rivest-Shamir-Adleman Cryptography (RSA)
O.ECC                         Elliptic Curve cryptographic services
                              The TOE shall provide the following specific security functionality to the
                              Smartcard Embedded Software: Elliptic Curve Cryptography (ECC)



The TOE shall provide “Cryptographic service AES-TDES-MAC (O.AES-TDES-MAC)” as specified below.
O.AES-TDES-MAC                           Cryptographic service AES-TDES-MAC
The TOE provides secure cryptographic services for AES and TDES MAC generation and verification.




Table 11                    Security Target Lite



4. Security Objectives
                       This chapter describes the security objectives for the TOE and the security objectives for
                       the TOE environment. The security objectives for the TOE environment are separated
                       into security objectives for the development and production environment and security
                       objectives for the operational environment.
                       Extensions to the security objectives from the PPs [5] [6] are underlined and listed in
                       section 8.4.

                 4.1 SOs for the TOE
                       This section describes the security objectives for the TOE addressing the aspects of
                       identified threats to be countered by the TOE and organizational security policies to be
                       met by the TOE.


                       OT.Sens_Data_Conf                     Confidentiality of sensitive biometric reference data
                       The TOE must ensure the confidentiality of the sensitive biometric reference data
                       (EF.DG3 and EF.DG4) by granting read access only to authorized Extended Inspection
                       Systems. The authorization of the inspection system is drawn from the Inspection
                       System Certificate used for the successful authentication and shall be a non-strict subset
                       of the authorization defined in the Document Verifier Certificate in the certificate chain to
                       the Country Verifier Certification Authority of the issuing State or Organisation. The TOE
                       must ensure the confidentiality of the logical travel document data during their
                       transmission to the Extended Inspection System. The confidentiality of the sensitive
                       biometric reference data shall be protected against attacks with high attack potential.

                       OT.Chip_Auth_Proof                              Proof of MRTD’s chip authenticity
                       The TOE must support the General Inspection Systems to verify the identity and
                       authenticity of the MRTD’s chip as issued by the identified issuing State or Organization
                       by means of the Chip Authentication as defined in [12]. The authenticity proof provided
                       by MRTD’s chip shall be protected against attacks with high attack potential.
                       Application note: The OT.Chip_Auth_Proof implies the MRTD’s chip to have (i) a
           Additional objectives due to TOE specific functions and augmentations
 O.Mem-Access                                   Area based Memory Access Control
 O.Prot_TSF_Confidentiality                     Protection of confidentiality of TSF
 O.RSA (only available, if ACL is part of the   RSA cryptographic services
 TOE and Crypto2304T user accessible)
 O.ECC (only available, if ACL is part of the   Elliptic Curve cryptographic services
 TOE and Crypto2304T user accessible)
 O.AES-TDES-MAC (only available, if SCL is      AES-TDES-MAC cryptographic services
 part of the TOE)

4.2                Security Objectives for the development and operational
                   Environment
The security objectives from [PP0084] section 4.2, 4.3, 7.2.1, 7.3.1, 7.3.2, 7.4.1 and section 7.4.2 are applicable
for this TOE.
The table below lists the environmental security objectives.

Table 12      Security objectives for the environment according to [PP0084]
 Environmental objective       description
 OE.Resp-Appl                   Treatment of User Data
 OE.Process-Sec-IC              Protection during composite product manufacturing
 OE.Lim_Block_Loader            Limitation of capability and blocking the Loader
 OE.Loader_Usage (only          Secure communication and usage of the Loader
 applicable , if Flash
 Loader active and TOE is

Security Target                                          20                                                       v4.0
                                                                                                            2020-10-15
Security Target Lite

Security objectives (ASE_OBJ)

 Environmental objective       description
 ordered with
 configuration option EA
 unavailable)
 OE.TOE_Auth (applicable ,     External entities authenticating of the TOE
 if Flash Loader active and
 TOE is ordered with
 configuration option EA
 unavailable)



Table 13      Additional Security objectives for the environment
 Environmental objective       description
 OE.Prevent_Masquerade         User is required to provide mechanisms to prevent masquerading attacks in
 (only applicable, if Flash    case the TOE does not claim the package “Authentication of the Security IC”.
 Loade active and              The authorized user must further support trusted communication with the TOE
 configuration option EA       by confidentiality protection and authenticity proof of data to be loaded and
 available)                    fulfilling the access conditions required by the Loader.



4.3                Security Objectives Rationale
The security objectives rationale of the TOE is defined and described in [PP0084] section 4.4, 7.3.1, 7.3.2, 7.4.1
and section 7.4.2.
Compared to [PP0084] an enhancement regarding memory area protection has been established. The clear
definition of privilege levels for operated software establishes the clear separation of different restricted
memory areas for running the firmware, downloading and/or running the operating system and to establish a
clear separation between different applications. Nevertheless, it is also possible to define a shared memory
section where separated appl                unique identity as given by the MRTD’s Document Number, (ii) a secret to prove its
                       identity by knowledge i.e. a private authentication key as TSF data. The TOE shall
                       protect this TSF data to prevent their misuse. The terminal shall have the reference data
                       to verify the authentication attempt of MRTD’s chip i.e. a certificate for the Chip
                       Authentication Public Key that matches the Chip Authentication Private Key of the
                       MRTD’s chip. This certificate is provided by (i) the Chip Authentication Public Key
                       (EF.DG14) in the LDS [11] and (ii) the hash value of the Chip Authentication Public Key
                       in the Document Security Object signed by the Document Signer.
                       OT.AA_Proof                       Proof of MRTD’s chip authenticity by Active Authentication
                       The TOE may support the Extended Inspection Systems to verify the identity and
                       authenticity of the MRTD’s chip as issued by the identified issuing State or Organization
                       by means of the Active Authentication as defined in [11].




                                       All information pications may exchange defined data. The privilege levels clearly define by using a
hierarchical model the access right from one level to the other. These measures ensure trovided in this documenhat the threat T.Mem-
Access is clearly covered by the security objective O.Mem-Access.
Thet is subject to legal disclaimers.     © NXP B.V. 2020. All righ objectst